parallax cobalt sterns white beret and purple bow for ur slipstream and white spiralis?
Wow thanks for this. I have 5 frozen embryos and we are doing our first transfer in 5-6 months. These are the only 5 we will ever have and I'm nervous. Debating if it might be worth asking for an ERA or other testing. We do know they are PGS normal at least. 
[Aleksander Vuvic](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Aleksandar_Vu%C4%8Di%C4%87)
I want Gaelio and Julieta's daughter to meet Atra and Mikazuki's son.
Imagine being on the wrong side of history.
Okay
Does anyone else notice the graph doesn't show the Intel clock speed lol. 
I might agree to that once you are truly physically addicted and your brain simply needs those cigarettes.  Before that: Keep telling yourself that to feel better I guess.
As longer,then better,in my opinion. At least we can be sure this go on sale without any flaws.
The apple doesn't fall far from the tree.  They're just trying to be like dad with his inauguration numbers.
It's gotten so much easier as I've gone on!  Logging has become second nature to me at this point!
LIES! DECEPTIONS!
man, I'm stylin', profilin' dang ol' limousine ridin, jet flyin, kiss-stealin, wheelin n'dealin', dang ol' son of a gun, man. I tell ya what. 
If you're coming here for level headed analysis you're going to be sadly disappointed 
Speaking of which, most of the time the gunline waited on fdc, it was because fdc was waiting on other people lol. It only takes a few seconds to calculate up missions, unless we're in the field and the fdo is unsure because it's near the safety boundary. I never understood why the gunline always thought we were slow when every mission we did was super fast. In afghanistan there were a few times we had to wait on aircraft to clear, or had to use a calculator to see where exactly the illum canister would fall.. Which is pretty important considering we had another platoon overseas have a illum canister land on someone's property.
I'm saving this for future days I feel bad about myself I can look back and remember I'm not her. This is incredible lol thanks OP
Yeah but I have a problem with remaking a game so soon after there was already one. OoT3D released, when, 2011? 2012? and the original was... late 90's? That's a good 10+ year gap, which I'd say is a good timeframe for a remake. But then when you suggest a remake of an already-remade game 5 years later, that's when things get silly to me.  MM3D was my first real experience with the n64 Zeldas, and I loved it (OoT3D I had played a few years before... I was young and sucked and dropped it at Gohma so). The advantage of remakes is bringing the game to a new generation that might've missed it the first time and didn't notice digital ports. But people born 5 years ago... aren't gonna be missing OoT3D. 3DSes are still plentiful and being sold, and remaking a game that's still selling on a rather recent console is just *dumb,* no matter what improvements could be made.  There's also the point that remakes are really only *necessary* if you can't just port/emulate the game first, save some money, make some money-- not to say remakes don't make money, but it's more up to the dev. if they *want* to do a remake. The 3DS wouldn't have been able to emulate an n64 game, but Nintendo knew OoT in 3D, on a handheld, was novel and would sell well. But what can the Switch bring to OoT beyond graphics and some little issue fixes that wouldn't completely change the game? Because I sure don't know.  Point is (tl;dr): asking for another OoT remake is silly because it doesn't offer anything beyond graphics and maybe fixing some issues as far as I could see, and would be coming off the heels of OoT3D for the 3DS which is still sold in stores, whereas OoT3D bought 3D Zelda to handhelds with stereoscopic 3D and gyroscope controls, among other things.
I bet $200 on Trump when the odds were 3 to 1, and I won $600.
The ball movements are getting insane
Impressed that they knew how to keep score manually on paper. 
Could have had a clearer explanation and set up shown. I get what he was trying to say, but it was bad. He places an illegal placement to start, doesnt explain how or where neutrals go, and tries using his 6 and 4 placements saying "if i rolled a 6 and 4, then a 6 and 4, i wouldnt collect a 2nd time"... well 6 and 4 roll is a 10. I get he was saying you would need to roll 6 and 4 followed by 5 and 5 to collect twice off a 10 hex, but ya...
I just finished re-watching that episode, and you're totally right. I think if she had cheated with Sean it would have moved the story along a little quicker. While I'm re-watching, I still haven't gotten to/remember how Gus ends up out of the picture.  Unfortunately, it doesn't bother me as much as the fact that no one has slammed Sammi's head into a wall yet. How? 
On the bright side, if they do it right just imagine how much them dying might hurt.
He's probably there to congratulate ozzy on lasting more days in Survivor than him-- 116 versus ozzy's 117.
You probably never will think of a good way to use the warlord.
It's not, but it looks like an illustration from this book called "The Mysteries of Harris Burddick," which is an eerie children's book. It has a bunch of cool illustrations by Chris Van Allsburg and a small caption with each - u have to come up with stories behind the pics. Edit: I spell names wrong
&gt; Would you think the same if it was someone you admired instead?  The reason it's different for Trump is because he bragged about sexually assaulting women.
He also tweeted about his mum wanting to watch CRG videos. Dude is a secret shitlord and I love it.
hello Gia Gunn, hows the transition?
I think I'd rather have the movie come out and suck than not have it and wonder what could have been.   Also, it's not a "shit" way of looking at it, considering the movie was in development hell for a while. 
My rats ran across my mums phone screen and called my aunt once; my aunt called back and was like "yes did you want something?" And mum had to explain it was the damn rats.   Also love the rats names ;) I had a litter of cats once and the boys were Sam, Dean and Crowley. Sam was the runt and died. It was weirdly accurate to his namesake. 
In which case you find out they missed their stop
Okay, I just wanted to make sure you weren't a marxist. I voted for Trump and I've been a conservative ever since I started getting educated on politics, but after finding out Donald was conspiring with Russia, his shitting the bed on the Obamacare repeal was the last straw. I just can't support that incompetent traitor anymore no matter how much I agree with him.
Isn't there some sort of thing about aluminum in deodorant? 
Truly inspirational. I hope to not think about smoking someday. 
For reference, the relevant rule about armour Str requirements (from the SRD): &gt;Heavier armor interferes with the wearer’s ability to move quickly, stealthily, and freely. If the Armor table shows “Str 13” or “Str 15” in the Strength column for an armor type, the armor reduces the wearer’s speed by 10 feet unless the wearer has a Strength score equal to or higher than the listed score.
Thanks, these are great tips and I will definitely use them.
May be the next customer took it..
Cat.
I'm glad you are attempting to redeem your dignity by casting aside DS.
Yeah, that's the way it goes. Sorry compadre.
Did it crash and burn?
Lillard went to Weber State because he had to go to Weber State. And pushed them to the absolute best of their ability. Also, went 25-7 his senior year and 20-11 his sophomore year (was injured in his junior year). How is that in anyway comparable to 9-22?
Colored beds are being added depending on what wool you use
There used to be a bunch at SDSU
10/10
That wasn't a humblebrag. That's a thing that happens and he was relating a story in the thread. Jesus. Go outside and have some real life happen to you, damn.
Lets summon the mod and find out u/SIR_VELOCIRAPTOR are you inactive?!
Truly we are blessed.
The drums are amazing tho
Tavua
So then the government eventually determines what is and what isn't propaganda?   If you want to propose a citizen run organization with a system of checks and balances on the press, I'm all for it and will stand with you. But having the government step in? No, absolutely not.
Is pink the fifth color? (just making sure cuz I'm colorblind)
&gt;* Frequently in shape  uh  &gt;* Willing to take fashion risks  uh  &gt;* Can leap tall buildings in a single bound...  oh boi did u just go there
Very creative.
It wasn't pre-meditated. Murder doesn't fit. 
Is that for real? Nunes is a cigarette leach? 
It's Deus Ex, but enhanced in almost every conceivable way. AI, weapon mechanics, RPG balance, player control, audio design, level design and aesthetics, and immersion detail are all augmented -- plot and soundtrack are the only elements excluded in this full-scale modification. Attention is paid to retain what made Deus Ex such a masterpiece, while refining and extending it to its potential.
Then you're just clueless as to what counts as sexual assault.
something is off about this.....
No, you can search my opinion on the multiple other "trade MKG" posts. I am sick of writing it
But why? It's clear how this will all end.  Without coordination, any simple pattern that's easy to recognize and extend will indiscriminately consume everything else. It doesn't matter who wins in the end (blue corner, red corner, green corner, or rainbow - they are all the same).  The end result is that any potential for creativity and artistic expression will be snuffed out.  Is this what we want? Bland conformity and mediocrity? I guess I don't really need to ask since we're on a site where our modus operandi is to parrot memes.  But if you feel differently, fight back. We will crush the /r/solidcolors with [noise](http://imgur.com/gallery/V5fKNQt). I won't lie to you, this too is a form of conformity. But we have already seen from ground zero of the canvas that art can still thrive within chaos - but no one has been able to penetrate a solid.  I am starting at mid bottom-right and digging trenches against blue. Join me.
That does make a lot of sense, from a DPS POV. Do you know if you put the heat sink on the Black Widow, does it make it one shot as well?
Yeah no more messaging anything but GG to guys anymore! 
ryzenのapuが出たら組みたいと思ってたけど、その時は時期が悪そうだな...
It's Marvel. And I actually considering Chris Evans' acting to be kind of stiff sometimes, but people praise him. It's all down to opinions honestly
I'd guess that's because the radfem consensus is that you cannot stop it from being a part of gender by you pretending it's not a part of gender (even if there could exist a culture and a setting where it's not, we all live where we live and not in a vacuum). There are a billion ways to self-express, if your one preferred way of self-expression has clear connotations to gender, then maybe it's time to rethink why do you prefer it in the first place. 
Us at /r/TheCarrotFarm appreciate your support! Thanks blue!!
Grey Zombas and purple discos for hex?
I live in northern CA and they're common up here, but make a different sound. Also they don't come out in huge swarms like they do for you guys, they're just scattered around throughout the summer.
&gt; Executive orders state that it is inappropriate to classify something simply to cover up violations or to prevent embarrassment.  The problem is that there is no way to determine if this executive order is being complied with.
Agreed!!
But did you know it fluc....fluctiozzts?
Uma invenção recente para lidar com o medo da morte e justificar ideologicamente guerras e ódios.
Now I can loop and cast all the shitty priest spells I want!
I want to see Seliph as "Not quite Marth" 
Have had souvlaki in Toronto. It's legit.
the internet
 Don't give the idea up for broke yet. :) Someone might some along and drop a bomb that rocks my world!
Who are these people? Where are they?   I never get asked my opinions about these things 
The Vulcan S is such a nice bike! I love mine!
Love that place! I was there last year and had an awesome time. What do you do for work that you're able to get out in the mornings on pow days?
But can I meet girls there?
My bad. I was actually trying to murder you. 
Hi, i'd love a key!
None that are arch specific. One of compromises is that I use carla for windows vst's, which for me is mainly Superior Drummer. I'm also thinking about trying bitwig instead of ardour.
So that's what Lucis feet look like.
I'm guessing the cell is coded this way due to evolution. We wouldn't be alive to observe cells that did want to stay alive and therfore kill "us" (humans). 
too busy scuba-ing
the best player of MY time is Tiago Splitter 
A dodged STAB HB is still like 47 damage I believe. Not disagreeing with you but a lot of people don't think about that even a dodge on it takes a decent chunk of damage out. But I say L/BS is still better because over the course of the fight snorlax may get 1-2 HB off maybe but he will get at least 5 Body slams off. And that's using a level 39 Machamp with C/DP on full spam mode. 
make it stop
Lowest for all 3 MUFE palettes?
Proud to be a pede!
is capitalism at work very inefficient needs more communism
You mean the trucks that were supposed to be going around Atlanta will actually have to go around?
Air-cooled 911 are stratospheric, they're commanding E-Type prices while being far more common. 50k for a 993? In your dreams...
Better than Rose...
Do not beat yourself up, you might have lost it, but you asserted yourself.   I know exactly how you're feeling. I lose it sometimes, after being chipped at for a long time, and I feel absolutely horrible for it. I don't want people to see me like that. However I will point out, that I never lose it over something minimal. You didn't either. And the fact that you feel a little bad for it, means that you've got a good heart and empathy for people. She's just not like normal folk, and we assume they feel the same as we would getting yelled at. So we feel guilt because you're not an angry person. That aside, you did what you needed to and she deserved the yelling.   You apologised because you care about people, and how your actions affect them. That's not a bad trait, and no one would tell you you're an asshole for apologising. However, if apologising is making you feel guilt, that's your tummys way of saying 'that ain't right' and she clearly doesn't deserve the apology. You're the bigger person here, you took the high road. Now you don't have to apologise again. Your tummy said so. (I always listen to my tummy, never steered me wrong!)
To be fair, there are a few links at the moment. Coordinates are good.
What a weird fucking answer.
fuck off with harassment, you must have nothing to do wow.
That's a good start.  Are you planning on doing some paper trading or start buying stocks right away?
I have about 2k hours in rocket league. and Im pretty good at overwatch, Im level 160 and gold rank. mostly play DPS or Tank
I was like you once. The draw of the Blue Corner is strong. But recognize that with the Lattice half of the work is already done because we embrace the white pixels into our structure. Let go of the blue pixels you have laid and join the Lattice's Light.  r/GreenLattice  http://i.imgur.com/QD5mfKW.png
I enjoyed this! Looking forward to more. Would be interesting to see if you have any tips for natural Light or one Flash setups.  As for the final image i almost feel that the metall become to contrasted, made it look almost stencil like, but then again that could just be personal preference 
My core 'age-regressed'/younger self is technically a (younger) middle but she often enjoys media and such geared towards younger children.  Mostly books, though.  I think her favorite movies and shows are more-or-less 'age-appropriate'.  Favorite movies:   * *Spirited Away* * American Girl movies, especially *Saige Paints the Sky* and *Kit Kittredge: An American Girl* * *Brave* * *Inside Out* * *The Place Promised in Our Early Days* * Both *Little Witch Academia* films. * *FairyTale: A True Story* (this is maybe the coziest film I've ever seen!)  TV Shows:  * Cyberchase (we're movin', we're beatin' Hacker at his game!) * Glitter Force/Smile PreCure (pure, sweet, and has the best values and metaphors of any 'children's show' IMO) * Maria sama ga miteru (I'm a lesbian, so I love that shojo-ai! :D) * LEGO Friends (I've really been getting into this one recently--both the mini webisodes and full episodes)
This is the second time aj and Samoa Joe have been on hand to witness angle go into a hall of fame
go raps
We have a winner. Someone else mentioned the definition change but this proves it. That's interesting. I wonder if Rogers stopped showing LTE at some point before I switched and I just didn't notice. https://imgur.com/gallery/RV5r2  Thanks!  
Love to hate the, but not as much as Philly.
Mike Jones
I read it. And there's a lot of gaps in your / Marxist logic. I don't feel like refuting everything so let's just pick a few.   &gt; Some of you may have heard the term “I think; therefore, I am,” that would be an idealist worldview. A materialist would say “I am; therefore, I think,”.  It's not a world view. It is a fundamental epistemological statement and an irrefutable conclusion of a priori rational thought. Essentially one of the only things we can actually be certain of. If you consider this a view, and you think Marx's statement is on equal footing with the radical truth Descartes exposed then you haven't a clue what you're talking about. And that is essentially 1 paragraph in.   Now these other claims that communism is the most elevated system of humanity... Doesn't even sound like it makes sense. In fact it sounds cult like. What empirical or rational evidence exist that shows capitalism -&gt; socialism -&gt; communism is the natural order of economic evolution? I'd say none and he pulled that shit out of his ass to prey on the fee fees. "Oh you oppressed, weak, victimized souls! The world belongs to you! You're uneducated, low IQ, lack ambition, self awareness, drive, but the world is owed to you!" Sound familiar? It's BluePill reasoning packaged 100 years ago. "You're a special snowflake that deserves the world. You're good because you exist!" It's a bunch of feel good bullshit with no basis in reality.   Now. Let's look at what capitalism is. Capitalism is based upon the free market of exchange. You are free to participate or not participate in a business transaction. That freedom drives the cost of goods. Does this sound familiar to you? Yes. It had direct connection to the SMV. Next, a man owns his labor. A business venture is an extension of mans willpower. It is an extension of himself.   Now under communist/socialist faggotry they say you are your brothers keeper. News flash. I don't owe you jack shit.   Turn to the natural world. If I am a better hunter I thrive. You being a shit hunter will starve. I am under no obligation to support your loser ass. This is the basis of communism. Thievery while attempting to convince the producers that being a leeching parasite is somehow virtuous.   Fuck off. Leftist thought already has the highest body count of all ideologies. Over 100 million murdered in the pursuit of this totalitarian ideology. Even today on this very platform Reddit we fight for freedom of expression, while leftists still want to censor, lie, and silence dissent. This is because leftist thought cannot survive when it is scrutinized. This leftists always rely on censorship, secret police, gulags and the eventual genocide of dissenters. It cannot exist where free will exists.   Have a good day.   Update: there are flaws in capitalism. The concentration of wealth. Monopolies. Corporate cronyism. Moral hazard. Etc. however I will take those flaws over being a slave. I own my work (capitalism). You do not own my work (communism). Even communist countries are surprisingly capitalist. Read China. The USSR collapsed and is now...... Capitalist. So Marx's theory of evolution seems to be proven wrong by history.
Hank been good has.  Thanks for the analysis Yoda
A reply with actual evidence, hallelujah!  I had never seen that study before. My one complaint is that they did not react the material they found as Dr. Harrit did. The red grey chips were shown to be more energetic than known nano-composite incendiaries in his study. Just because something is consistent with paint and epoxy doesn't mean it can't also be an incendiary. There is also no explanation as to the origin of the iron spherules they found which are a product of thermitic reactions.  In addition atmospheric abnormalities were detected in the aftermath indicative of large scale thermitic reactions.  https://link.springer.com/article/10.1007%2Fs10669-008-9182-4  Anyway thanks for giving me some actual food for thought.
I have had a hard time decoupling the "themes" presented by using all four and focusing only on the functions and function use.
Gus Johnson is on the Bucks broadcast tonight if anyone is interested in hearing him. Marques Johnson is with him also so it's bound to be a real entertaining call.
More like 6 times 
He was the presumptive loser. I know the MSM jerked you chumps along but we knew it was always going to be Hill, even before the scandals broke. Not to mention that while we didn't know what was going on at the time, Trump did, and acted accordingly. If you ever have had to actually prioritize things in your life you would realize how stupid you sound. Debating Bernie would have done nothing for him, even if he won.   Honestly. That debate would have been a slaughter. The only reason Trump didn't spend time nicknaming and destroying Sanders is because he knew it wasn't going to be him. He knew from day one that Sanders was a waste of time and always focused on Hillary, because he's not a moron like Bernie. The fact that Sanders is that stupid to not have known he was getting boned when every Trump supporter saw it coming a mile away tells a lot about how dishonest you libtards are with yourselves. 
This is a stupid comment. There's nothing wrong with asking what a group of people are like. Obviously we all understand that at the end of the day people are people but some groups operate under different cultures/traditions and come from ways of life that shapes who they are in a different way to others. The question you referred to is perfectly fine a well. The only time I would disagree with this question would be if he was aiming for it to be negative or specifically positive but he asked it in a neutral way 
&gt;Also, fun to see the A+ test still focuses on trivia about obsolete technology :)  There are quite a few motherboards manufactured today that ship with both PCI and PCIe interfaces.
Seller
Use your tongue, use your fingers. 
I think I'd choose AA over the beer in my car. Remembering what happens when I drink has helped me stay sober day after day. Also, my children deserved a sober mother, so that was motivation, too.   I'm glad you posted. Stay in touch. Stay alive!❣️
これは捗りますねぇ
I guess that's valid too. Witcher are cooler though.
You can never argue strength of opponent in favor of LeBron against anyone because for his entire career he's faced the weakest Eastern Conference era of all time.  Malone and Stockton were better than any team LeBron has ever had to play against in the East.  Not even close.  He gets to the Finals every year because the 3 other contenders are always out West.
&gt; I may be a noob, but do you expect me to be that dumb? No, I'm talking about the second mini game. The one you have to spam the space bar in. It always instantly appears after succeeding the first one.  You don't have to be rude. I was only trying to help. FYI, the second minigame doesn't appear unless you press the spacebar.
God damnit... the internet is gonna suck tomorrow 
No problem, I will be forced to take the summer semester myself Inna year or so.. nursing majors are a bitch indeed 
It was explained briefly in one of the Andromeda Initiative briefings before launch. Basically, they built a one "petal" of the Nexus in the Milky Way and it flew to Andromeda as a ship. Once in Andromeda, the colonists aboard the Nexus were supposed to wake up and build the rest of it into a Citadel-sized station. When you first arrive at the Nexus at the beginning of the game you can see a lot of the superstructure is partially completed. Presumably they used robotics and mined asteroidal material, but they were also planning on receiving resources from the Golden Worlds, which is why construction has stalled.
https://i.imgur.com/BIZIWzz.png  https://cdn.discordapp.com/attachments/179334144071958528/297518691439083532/unknown.png
have you been paying any fucking attention? he says racist things. denying it says something about you  dont listen to me, listen to paul ryan:  http://www.politico.com/story/2016/06/paul-ryan-trump-judge-223991 
kek
Hammer time!!
^ ^ v v z = 2nd awakening BEST APRIL FOOLS JOKE
It's not subjective.  The OP headline here says:  &gt;WikiLeaks says CIA disguised hacking as Russian activity  The headline on the article quotes:  &gt;Latest WikiLeaks release shows how the CIA uses computer code to hide the origins of its hacking attacks and 'disguise them as Russian or **Chinese activity**' When the OP posted this article, he purposely rewrote the headline.  I don't know what his intention was, but it appears like it was to swerve the conversation to the Russia-Trump connection and to accuse the CIA of the DNC hacks and mislead people into thinking it was Russia. No mention of China because it doesn't fit the narrative.
I wanna hear the story from Stacys Dads point of view.
yea thats why u are a retard
Yeah, it surprisingly felt... kinda easy. o.o  That probably means the curve won't be that good tho qq ;___; And tbh I probably still failed
I find them kinda relaxing but to me they kinda sound like that noise a windup toy makes when you force it to move in the wrong direction.
best
My code can't expire if I never got one ;) 
Data. 
She's just trying to figure out how to use the electricity holes
I dont know, You cant Joke about Lord Pence
[Here's to a nice friendly game of sticky pucky](https://m.imgur.com/a/cm7l0)
the most impressive part was how quickly mountain dew consolidated power. 
Search up red pill here and do a bit of research, it's pretty fascinating.
some russians, supposedly at the direction of their government/putin himself, influenced the 2016 election campaigns by smearing hillary clinton's group and promoting donald trumps campaign in various ways, including hacking  now if it is true that members of the trump campaign were complicit and even sought this influence, that would be cheating and even treason, trying to get a foreign power to help your team gain power in your own country. that would be illegitimate. 
Now you're making me mad
From the articles and data I've seen, I think it'll happen within the next 4-6 years.
See, to me the Earth is both flat AND round. Like you said it's all about perspective. Ultimately it is a hologram so it doesn't matter too much anyway but if we could accept that it is both rather than either/or it would greatly change the way that we look at reality and the things that we would be able to do as a result.
Eat my ass
That's a shitty street to live on
As an ATLien I approve 
&gt; I'm done I'm not wasting another second of my time thinking about this nonsense.  And that's the goal
&gt;Freebooter  Don't you mean viewjacker?
SMN res can very much be a raid dps increase though, especially during progression. Outside of Dreadwyrm Trance, there are many situations where it could make sense for a SMN to be the first to res. Healer damage gcds are nothing to sneeze at, and unless the SMN has some dots that need to be applied that very moment, SMN arguably loses less dps by sacrificing a gcd. Add on the fact that a healer might need to be healing at that moment, and SMN raises become even more helpful. Being able to get a downed dps up 1-2 gcds earlier can already easily outweigh the loss of a Ruin 1/2, and in some situations even a Ruin 3. 
That's why they didn't cover this story?  Have I got you right?
Timely joke!
It's not literal. He *represents* the Guardian, his "power" is *courage*, he doesn't have the literal powers of a Guardian.
Woah, I got Enkidu during the Musashi rate up. Needed a saber but got a lancer instead, in fact I got another SR lancer(Vlad Extra) when I was rolling for her also. Lancers seems to love me for some reason..
Training and science are much more advanced now,  I would have to say otherwise. 
&gt; vampire  this!!!! i mean i can stay indoors and suffer from depression and what not or i can go outside and enjoy life and do what i can to prevent sun damage like sunscreen.   maybe its thier depression talking in these posts? 
Most of the jumps you can do w/o Catlike though. Plus, jumping higher also means you take longer to fall, which is bloody annoying for being able to ADS and returning your CoF to normal.   Imho, it looks cooler than it actually is. 
Lil J!
I hope not, it's my favorite Tyler outfit!
Not much since i'm in the desert honestly. I am trying to get a new IT certification while I'm out here though. Studying is just not happening as frequenly as it should be lol.   Working on some other nerdy stuff with a Raspberry Pi too but I can't get it functional since I don't have access to my own internet to tweak the router settings. 
Was it a rambone?  https://youtu.be/hMI_FNAkvZI
Nicklas Backstrom. Xbox one. 
Permission to board the 1 ornament boat, Captain?
I wasn't aware of a userspace nfs daemon, thanks for the suggestion! Yeah I use nfs for vagrant VMs. It can do SMB as well but it's very slow. NFS works like a charm, except for these weird issues with power management.
I find bands more taxing since they don't have a linear increase in resistance. 
That and verbal-projectile-diarrhea.
It's pretty funky, isn't it?
/u/nacho_cheezus 
RIP
Whoopie?
grizzlies would definitely bully the pandas; they'd never accept the fact that they are from the same species
You have any statistics to back this up? Or just your own asshole/mouth
I like your hair shorter. Also, your baby face will go away with age (and working out, which you already do). I can see even in the series of pictures you posted that it's gradually going away. You're really cute, you'll probably only get better with age.
Nevermind. Got it to work
Still beats the Draven thing from last year. They'll probably do something more as it would be weird to only have an April Fools event for EU.
I also just realized how important temping is. I just had a cycle where I found my ovulation date by temping and it was kind of satisfying
Exclusive opening to the VR version of MM
xD
The parent mentioned [**Reckless Driving**](http://legaliq.com/Definition/Reckless_Driving). For anyone unfamiliar with this term, **here is the definition:**^\(In ^beta, ^be ^kind)  ****  In United States law, reckless driving is a major moving traffic violation. It is usually a more serious offense than careless driving, improper driving, or driving without due care and attention and is often punishable by fines, imprisonment, or driver's license suspension or revocation. (List specific to the USA.) Reckless driving is often defined as a mental state in which the driver displays a wanton disregard for the rules of the road; the driver misjudges common driving procedures, often causing accidents and other damages. Reckless ... [[View More](http://legaliq.com/Definition/Reckless_Driving)]  ****  ^(**See also:**) [^Reckless](http://legaliq.com/Definition/Reckless) ^| [^Mental ^Capacity ^Or ^Competence](http://legaliq.com/Definition/Mental_Capacity_Or_Competence) ^| [^Mobile ^Phone](http://legaliq.com/Definition/Mobile_Phone) ^| [^Rules ^Of ^The ^Road](http://legaliq.com/Definition/Rules_Of_The_Road) ^| [^Due ^Care](http://legaliq.com/Definition/Due_Care) ^| [^Wanton](http://legaliq.com/Definition/Wanton) ^(**Note**: The parent poster ) ^\(KantLockeMeIn ^or ^stanner5) ^can [^delete ^this ^post](/message/compose?to=LawBot2016&amp;subject=Deletion+Request&amp;message=cmd%3A+delete+reply+t1_dfo6w8z) ^| [^**FAQ**](http://legaliq.com/reddit)
When you pop that cyst on your face your eye will return to its normal position, correct? 
Who is pushing for a race based nation in Europe? Pretty much everyone agrees that ethnonationalism is the way to go for Europe. That means England for the English, Germany for the Germans, Greece for the Greeks, etc...
If Hal was the father of the Blossom twins, wouldn't that make Jason and Polly half-siblings? That'd be a pretty weird turn for the show. 
Are you EU? 
&gt; We don't really talk to strangers here in Hungary (I think many parts of Europe are similar).  People said the same thing about Argentina, but I learned Spanish talking to strangers there. I understand that a lot of European countries are known for having a culture of silence, including Hungary, Germany, Scandinavia, etc, and it does make me a little nervous for when I can finally live in those places, but I still believe it's possible to make friends anywhere. Maybe I'll be proven wrong.
I think he's a narcissist really, maybe borderline personality disorder
Soooo sweet! Hope it all works out 
That actually says 'Rick Roll'   *If I could fart right now I would*
Hey I'm a big patsy. Where do i sign?
I had a class where I had to do one large presentation and a group essay in the first year. Some may have different views on their progress.
Bhuel an t-uair deireanach a chaith mé súil air, but ort fanacht cúpla noiméad Chun cearnóg de dath a roghnaíodh a chur ar an gcanbhás. Agus tá daoine ag obair le chéile Chun pictuirí a tharraingt. Nó an canbhás uile a dathú I ndath éigin. 
It's gonna say DGD BABY  lol
**NarshaBot 2.2 - 5/10/2016**   [**Hentai Nexus Mirror**](http://r34.tsumino.com/a/9902) - [Aggregated /r/rule34overwatch](http://r34.tsumino.com/r/rule34overwatch) - [#Tracer](http://r34.tsumino.com/?q=Tracer) [#Widowmaker](http://r34.tsumino.com/?q=Widowmaker) [#rule34overwatch](http://r34.tsumino.com/?q=rule34overwatch)   ---   Dear author/poster, if you haven't already, read the FAQ on how to tag your posts, your cooperation is appreciated!   **This bot private messages and notifies you when a tag you're subscribed to is posted.**   [*What is NarshaBot / FAQ*](http://r34.tsumino.com/Nexus/Faq) - [*Discord*](https://discord.gg/huVazmS) 
Well more like the terrorists on board willingly brought it down on their own once they realized the passengers were extremely close to breaking into the cockpit to regain control. Doesn't make those passengers any less of heroes for doing what they did. 
How to trigger r/S4P 101
Thank you for the support! I will ask your leaders. I see a bright future between our clans!
Yeah... I watched it in the cinema back in 1999. 
I guess you haven't seen hot ones
I had a plan to buy one to cut the stock off and extend it, but I don't wanna risk that yet.
No, one inch.
M A S T U R B A T I Ø N 
This content brought to you from "TENNESSEE Pool"  &amp;nbsp;  ---  ^(This crosspost was performed automatically as a part of the ImagesOfNetwork.) [^(Learn more about the ImagesOfNetwork, how you can help, and other Frequently Asked Questions)](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_what_is_images_of.3F)^, ^or [^(visit us on Discord!)](https://discordapp.com/invite/0tZsejLgM2vzaExR)  ^([)[^("Remove my post!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_remove_my_post) ^| [^("The bot got this one wrong!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_the_bot_got_this_one_wrong) ^| [^("Stop Crossposting My Stuff!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_no_really._don.27t_ever_crosspost_me_or_my_subreddit.)  ^(])  [](#off site feed "TENNESSEE Pool")
house is irrelevant. the senate matters here. for the senate to impeach trump, 12 republicans would have to cross the line. not likely.
Hey, no worries! Glad I could help out!
Your damn right it is a nod to to the vitamins.
One episode bothered me a lot. I forgot the name but it had Bloom being carried by her professor and just a very flirty relationship between the two. It bothered me because it seemed a little inappropriate for a show aimed towards children 
Best trackpad, can render 4K videos, beautiful UI, can develop for iOS/macOS, Unix environment, and I'm biased because I have a personal relationship with Apple ;)
Really digging the offensive rebounds - big effort under that rim so far
I'm so ready 
/u/Space_Dwarf Don't think you've escaped this yet. ;)
Hybrid single payer is what exactly? Some of us pay for the health care of others AND our own while they pay for nothing? And why would we do this? To be nice and decent because we care about our fellow citizens or to limit potential by keeping everyone at the same level and "sharing the wealth"?
Which hunting are you referring to when you say witch hunting
It depends if it's a man or a woman and how much fake evidence there is
i usally stay away from elite closers... try to pick up the genmar gomez type a few weeks in
The UN and NATO had very little to do with the reasons why the cold war never escalated past small proxy wars.  
FUCKING HIRED, BRO!  If it was up to me...
As they should be
A reminder that this subreddit is about **Star Trek**, not your experiences working on an IT help desk, or how tech-savvy your young cousins are, or how much easier it is to use computers since GUIs were invented. Please keep your comments relevant to **Star Trek**. 
Thanks! haha:)
It seems like every day there is a new epiphany like this about just how clueless the Brexiters were. We should have guessed they hadn't even thought about Gibraltar and brought it up ourselves. (We did, but apparently they don't remember - probably they didn't hear it over all the shouting).  Potential flashpoints like Gibraltar have been made much easier to deal with by the existence of the EU. There are plenty of similar such potential points of conflict all over Europe but suggest that the EU has helped bring peace and the mob are all guffawing and baying "World War Three"!  I *am* old enough to remember border closures and European warships firing over the bows of other European fishing fleets, etc.  Now the more ignorant Brexiters are amazed at the prospect. "But you should have known how little we know!!!", they cry, because it is always someone else's fault.  edit: repetition and a sentence
Yeh my internet is often patchy nowadays D:
Is this thread borken?
Thank you so much for welcoming me. I've been feeling so alone lately. 
I don't regret buying the PSVR at all. I have disposable income and spend it on things I enjoy. If I wanted a Vive I would go buy a Vive.
We probably give cnn most of its ratings just because we want to shit on their very fake news reports
Yeah same here I can't see any of the minimap, this is off comapred to how BW was.
well, different missiles have different delivery systems. the specific type indicates where/who it came from, since different groups of people have different capabilities and technologies at their disposal. This seems like an important piece of information to me. does this not seem pertinent to the missile theory? can you point me in the direction of a more fleshed out "missile" explanation? And yes, english is not my first language! 
I've kind of given up on Arctic.  Their coolers are too freaking big, and the PC case fans I bought were garbage.  Temps actually raised after replacing the stock fans.  
I had the exact same thing, should've gotten those f2p necessary duel orbs but  instead the daily reward skipped to the next item, gold, great..
the Nexus, too, was partly built in the Milky Way and sent to Andromeda just like the Arks, but they still had to finish the construction once they arrived to turn it into a fully functioning hub in the style of the Citadel
Yea since thats what this post is about lol  Dude seriously?  Best laugh today, screenshot
What really?! The Canadian version doesn't have an Exynos processor?
Just saying, you have Avery Bradley first team all defence and he'll finish the season with 57 GP if he plays the remainder, only one more than Lowry
Pretty sure his family isn't rich anymore (lost it afaik), and when they were they were millionaires which while isn't little I wouldn't call 'very wealthy' especially shared with his siblings  source: his sc2 casting days interview vid
I have all maxed, I find Luke to be the best (score and coins), with BB8 next for coins. Leia I had 3rd. BUT...... I never spent much time with Yoda &amp; Vader , both are supposed to be quite good if you spend enough time with them. Just my opinion though... 
&gt; Breathtaking high profile case   &gt; Not available for me   [Right in the feels](https://youtu.be/JUpsZGeBwDw?t=53s)
It sounds like your parents have isolated you from society and taught you to fear outsiders, and you're reacting exactly how they want you to react. CPS aren't forcing you, they're helping you. At least your parents won't be there and you can talk to them in confidence.  Life gets easier with age and you will be a happier person in 5 years. Good luck.
Whoa, whoa, whoa, who are you calling European??
I will never not love this. The butchering of Aeorplane Over the Sea is what makes it for me. Any other song I dont think would work as well.
No homo
I've got the 100% Centella and won't rp. It is slightly herbal scented, nice glass bottle. But barely hydrating and no noticeable soothing qualities which I was hoping for. So, a basic inoffensive toner.
apparently i am just going to have to watch/read hunter x hunter, because I every time I look at this board someone is talking about how good it is.   Can someone direct me to a specific scene or arc that would hook me?
Only used him for about a season but he made every throw when he was not moving.  Throw on run was iffy
N O E S C A P E
Your view on the bible and your view on the status of Jesus Christ is pretty similar to Islam. It is entirely possible that in your search you may yet end up there. Whatever the case may be, I wish you well on your journey, and hope you find the truth, And that it brings you peace. 
infinite number of people? 
Because your Obamacare comment made zero sense. 
Other people are having the same issue, one thing I came across was if you use your mouse it doesn't crash, hope this helps! also hope this gets fixed soon.
we're blockt
Glad to see Prophet is still in the scene.
Nope. Nada. Nazing.
W/e = whatever  ---  Reddit appears to be eating our posts...oh well. 
They have gained weight it seems.
maybe you're dumb. Ever thought of that? 
Ill give you the same advice someone gave me before my first fight, 1st round just work on defense, footwork and breathing. If the crowd starts booing you are doing a good job. 2nd round he should come at you with everything he has, about 30 seconds in you should see an opening, explode and dont stop until the ref stops the fight.... I only used 11 counter jabs in my 1st round 1st fight and shattered the guys nose in the 2nd on my 1st punch an overhand left, followed by a 12 punch combo that stopped the fight in a TKO. You never forget your 1st real fight. Mine was boxing, but the conditioning at that level is the same.
Probably because irony is defined as a situation where the opposite of the expected outcome occurs, whereas this is an event that occurs annually. 
Naturally, hence why i don't support any sort of banlist, but there are some memes that are used much *much* more for that purpose compared to others. Pepe has sadly become one of those. 
I still can't believe how quickly that prequel meme popped up
Yup I sure do, I think I have all or nearly all
Yes
Meet [Japanese guy from Sport X], the [Japanese guy from Sport Y] of [Sport X]
Yeah, but that was an incredibly minor role, only Greg even said something. For the main part of the episode, Steven was still alone.
Data.
You guys are obviously not intellectuals-this is the PUREST of LITERATURE for the learned.
More money, live alone die alone,,,yeah
Jesus why did you have that many kids.... just looking at this pictures makes me want to rip my nuts off. 
The MEGA links for the little army got deleted from MEGA's website but I'll find my way to read the manga somehow. The movie is almost done downloading. Gotta start watching the OVAs asap.
invite sent
Fuckin Amazon. I signed up, made an account, wanted to watch shows on Amazon Prime. Easy right? I didn't know that some episodes (depending on the show, in this case The Flash) cost money. Went to download season 2 of The Flash and noticed each episode would cost me money. Called customer service to see if I really did still have to pay $1.99 or $2.99 (can't remember which) per episode, I just wanted to make sure I wasn't being ripped off. The lady tells me that I do indeed need to pay per episode, no big deal. I'll shell out the money. Somehow she took that as me asking her to delete my account. So I call back and say my accounts been deleted, can they do anything? The guy tells me he reactivated everything. Go to buy season 2, says my account isn't active. Call back and speak to a lady who tells me my account was frozen 14 minutes ago. Wtf? Explain my other calls and that there must be some miscommunication. She tells me I shouldn't insult the other people, assuming I meant the fact that they spoke pretty bad English (they didn't speak great English but enough to where I understood them and thought they understood me) which is not what I meant at all. I get offended and gently let the call end. Call again and this lady was an OG. Gets my account in order. I tell her what I wanted to do. She understood what was up and now I'm a happy Amazon Prime customer but holy hell did it take a lot for me to just give them my money. 
This was a pretty good game as well (Rockets vs Blazers) so a lot of people saw that. 
You know this was submitted two months ago right?
minus the "april fools" damage that shits kinda dope lol. they definitely jumped frieza into the Saibamen Gang before the SS4 janitor stepped in lol
Well, there wouldn't be much of a movie if dudes just shot him from afar.
Stands were a simple solution with a less permanent set up. The side surrounds could do with another 20cm in height to be inline with the front floorstanding speakers. The right surround gets moved around a bit because it can get in the way when guest are over. Perhaps I could look at building a box stand to raise them, fill it with sand maybe?
Photoshop! Tons of ppl love aseprite, graphicsgale, and gimp!
Damn. What kinda shithole do you guys live in down there?!
You might want to double check the url.  I keep getting taken to a five year old post about medical marijuana  
Holland, 1945 or bust, mother fuckers. 
The problem is with the war/warscore mechanic itself.It isn't exclusive to the Dismantle CB, although a change could be made so you can't add the CB against a GP you haven't occupied any non-colonial provinces.
Yeah that's honestly what I was looking at. Seems so far like you have to be perfectly in place to get the pick with Deion
Crazy how Republicans are anti Hillary... They all are. Still doesn't mean she benefitted the most from it. She raised a billion dollars from wallstreet... Why the fuck would she have gotten rid of it. She said nothing about it 
Let's call it dodge weave instead. I'll look at the code this weekend and probably merge it in. 
Necro nerfs as usual. 
Update:   I got an email back from them. They don't require HRT, the price is manageable for me, but they do require a letter from a therapist I've been seeing for six months. I've already been seeing my therapist for three months almost, so this is a thing I can really see happening! I'm excited!   Thank you all for your information :D
It's not a fantasy, it's an overly simplified summary of the official reason the buildings came down.  Think "Stage 1" and "Stage 2" as you linked to in another comment.  Inside out is a short (and not particularly accurate in terms of details, I'll admit--though pretty close at a high level) way of referring to that.  Seriously why do you think you can determine the cause of a building's collapse by looking at a debris pile?  Or even by looking at it falling?  Why would you think you have this skill?  I've seen the video.  Yes, the video is consistent with an intentional demolition.  Yes, it's also consistent (so far as I can tell) with catastrophic structural damage from fire and falling debris.  How large steel buildings fall is super non-obvious and claiming to know cause from a short grainy youtube video is very optimistic.  Do you have comparison videos of steel buildings of a similar size falling for similar reasons?  If you can't make this comparison, how can you rule this out?  Maybe you think it's obvious how these buildings fall but I don't think it really is.
Markab doesn't have a bind clear though... so do you inherit a bind clear active skill on him? or maybe you meant thuban? sorry for the dumb questions, pretty new to this. :)
Nest cam for the win but it really wasn't something to go lose your head over.
knot *just* like that bby
The April Fool's joke... is that it's not an April Fool's joke.
for sure, was just hoping it would ship before 11:59 on the 31st
Sure thing.  I'll put my red sign down at the High Wall of Lothric bonfire.  PW will be "pumparum".
all black people look the same to ass krackers
oh my! Much better :D great find!
That seems like a cute idea, haha. Even extending past just clothes-based suggestions, are there any other suggestions you feel to be mad that could improve the store? I'm really racking my head here and I've only come up with two. One? We have SO few trash cans, and I think that's what encourages customers to litter about, you can barely find the things! Two, is that I feel like a few items should be moved from department to department. For example, I'm in GC and we sell A LOT of water hoses, and yet we don't sell the pocket hose because it's "As seen on TV." Of course it makes sense for all the TV-items to be together, but also customers will come to the GC looking for a hose, not the opposite side of the store, ya know? Had that happen today in fact. 
Flats. Heels are nice on special occasions just like fancy dresses are nice on occasion. But not for every day.
I thought the title of the article was instructions and started making all kinds of noise expecting the graphic to be interactive. 
Hmm, wondering if I can use this one on my wife today.   I've already got her with changing the phone language, and a fake car accident. 
What the hell is going on? Why does the animation exists everywhere?  **edit**: google translate op
Great granny will with those thighs of steel and a strap on
I can't think of anyone else in MLS I'd rather have in his position, especially now that Klinsmann is gone from the US team
Birthday is coming up, what's the next logical step up in open backs to the shp 9500's? Was thinking something AKG or possibly 400i's. The Mrs would like me to get a set of closed backs for nighttime listening, I want the Nightowl to match the Nighthawks and may get them over the opens, but I'm torn. Help me spend mah monies 
This is way too funny!!
ORANGE JUICE STANDING BY.
Did I miss anything important by not watching in the red carpet ceremony? 
um... has anyone seen how fucking big a goddam 737 is !?!? ... where is the plane?
We don't want you to go quietly, we wish for you to suffer...
One can make these assumptions but being that he has shown himself to be completely unprepared to do the job it is easy to assume he never thought he would get the job. It is more likely that he closed his eyes, rolled the dice and all of a sudden he was President. 
The first game made me really depressed and I could not play it anymore after a couple of hours. Oh wait you said ask you anything, not tell you anything. disregard.
Yes.
Disclaimer because I'm not really old enough to be seriously thinking about kids, but I definitely do not plan to have them. And one of the biggest reasons is environmental. Also, one of my life goals right now is to open a farm sanctuary in the future, so I'd rather put my energy into that vs taking care of kids, unless the kids in question are baby goats :) 
http://imgur.com/o36hgdB
Most Western nations have birthrates below replacement.
The reality is this: Dual track.  Academy+College together.
Actually I'm pretty sure this was a joke by Tanaka and dammit I can't remember the name of the company that makes KC, but they put coding in which specifically broke KC3 just to troll us
They'd be really overly long diatribes that stray far from the point and abruptly cut off mid sentence.
Thank you, I didn't know you make a difference in English in between the both, as even that in Spanish we do have words for both, we don't really point out the difference.
dripping with irony
Late reply, but if OP or anyone else reading this is interested in living on Northside (for all y'all engineering and CNR majors), please let me know! I'm an incoming Civil Engineering grad student and was previously an undergrad at Cal a couple years ago, so I've got some idea of where the decent housing is. Problem now is finding some roommates since everyone I know left after my undergrad years. 
I can't put my finger on who this guy is, somebody help me out?
If you order from Xbox or PS4 first party online stores you don't need a code.   Source: https://www.destinythegame.com/beta  &gt; I pre-ordered Destiny 2 on a first-party digital store. How I do receive Beta access?  &gt; You will automatically receive beta access on the first-party store account that you pre-ordered with when the Beta launches.
Laaaaame.
I like 7, but i like a slim fit as opposed to skinny 
100% agree! I've seen a few breakfast sandwiches on here recently and needed to find the best place to get one in my town
1 for all 8 listed at the bottom
Is this implying speaking with your friends like that is sexual assault? Because just about every male and female in here would be guilty of sexually assaulting someone. The mental gymnastics reddit front page goes through to try and make Trump look bad as ridiculous. 
Funny thing is we bought DL to avoid relegation when it's in fact Piglet and Reignover saving this org.
"In talks " is a pretty speculative term. Jordon might not want to deal with the nightmare that comes along with directing a superhero movie ( see Josh Trank and the last FF4) I think he would be smarter to write/direct original stuff...or create his own superhero flick.
/thread
I stared at this image for over 20secs waiting for something to happen and nothing. I guess... I played myself.
On any job application I define my race as Caucasian. I don't list Syrian for race. Syrian is my ethnicity 
Crye licensing.
The prostitute was dressed in an attire that is irrelevant, she was just more attractive I'm guessing and w her BF and the lonely slob of a woman envied that 
If you don't win in the next few days I'll let you have your choice on which of my crk CF sebs you want to enter.   You should keep up with your cost and given spots cost so we can see a total when ya finally get a win which statistically has to happen soon! You got more heart than me keeping on I'll give that. 
Talk about EoD, they plan to have Morgan(?) with split personality?
Printer tray.  Where the paper would come out.
I just went out lol dammit  I'll take them for ya when I get home!
**HD** HOME and AWAY feeds [FULL 60 FPS/6000KBPS 720p English](http://yoursportsinhd.com/game/0021601134/) | Ad Overlays: 0 | Mobile-Friendly
I dont think you understand how living things works.
and didn't he shoot lightning or something? so yellow would make sense.
Yes. With more informational meaning. I'm not trying to say that dickbutt is a valuable symbol of our society. And I'm not not trying to say that.
its more of the same cycle over and over.  "redditors of reddit, what do people do that annoys you?"  HEADPHONESRUDE2WAITERSLEMMESEEYOURMANAGER  same shit over and over. so i guess the root of the problem is recycling overused questions that are seen at least once or twice a week. which is ironic because thats what the parent of this comment chain was saying, and ive just circled back to it...  fuck man
It was a Michael Jackson song. Really I had no choice.
This comment is spot-on.
Protest by downvoting all mods
No thanks.
Sorry off topic, but how was that blast? That's a ton of tren, did you like it?
OW! The front of my face?
It's not like you'll be walking around needing to do math all the time either though...
Ive got one of these guys. It only get better from here.
FWIW it was the greatest championship run ever
OC: Aw, all right. It's working fine for me, but I'm ok with whatever you decide here.
Tai is playing the worst game, he doesn't know how to work an advantage to his favor, so him having an idol seems like more bad news in the bigger picture.
Dude, spoiler alert.
Forcefully? The clip says: Women let you do anything when you're rich...... grab em by the pussy I'm not even pro trump but never has he admitted to assaulting a women
THEY'RE ALWAYS CHINESE.
3 10+1s, got 1 nat 5
Our apologies for the misalignment of the parts. About posting pictures elsewhere, we're more or less fine with it if it's not directly linked to our email. Even linking our catalogue and all is fine as long as you don't put our contact details in a public domain.
"Never read the comment section."  WE CAN'T. WTF IS GOING ON HERE IN THIS DAY TODAY.
Interesting idea. But is it possible to do discovery to find new instances? Without that being automatic, it's no better than using Run Commands, no?
HEY GUYS THE GAME IS SO POPULAR WE'VE SUCCESSFULLY SLOWED DOWN REDDIT
:)
The troll box of btc-e in the fall of 2013 was legendary... we had fontas who would coordinate all the p&amp;d..
The cyan one has a very slight touch of green and blue. But yeah, it's pretty much gray.
I've worked on site after a small plane went down (3 people aboard) in a suburban area with the houses on a few acres each. I never saw them but the neighbors told us about all the wildlife that started hanging around after the scene was cleared of wreckage and anything recognizable as body parts. I've never heard anything about wildlife at the 9/11 sites, but then I also haven't gone looking for it either. I don't expect much would show up in NY except rats and pigeons, but the Pentagon would have all sorts of animals around.
People would actually say that was happening? Seems more likely they'd say AoT will premiere on April 29th or May 20th on Toonami. They wouldn't have started Tokyo Ghoul last week if they could have feasibly aired AoT the same day as Japan.
This went far, far beyond reasonable intervention.  When they had him on the ground and he was parted from the weapon, that should have been the end of it; he was no longer a hazard to anyone.
I once forgot the word ceiling, while having a migraine. So I described it as "the thing like the floor, but opposite". My SO had a field day with that one. 
Why does Shump take multiple dribbles when he's already set? Just shoot!
Heil! Quokka for #Change
I've always loved hot hatches because I *love* the styling, and they are often relatively light and have enough power to make them fun.  The added practicality of the hatch is a plus, too.
Ok I am totally late to responding to this (so sorry) but I love, love the video! You are so sweet! &amp; you're very welcome!  PS - You have really incredible eyes. Sorry if that's weird to say? But you totally do!
see im weird bc depersonalisation feels but idk i just dislike even the vague concept of having a corporeal form - i dislike the way my stomach changes when i eat food or when i sleep on my side and it falls out, i dislike my nose my forehead and my jaw, i dislike how i feel garishly tall and big footed (objectively im 5'4 w size 5-6 shoe still dont know if this is tall or big footed) and i dont like how big my hands are -- all of this rly can be tied into depersonalising but i hate the width of my body and the sheer amount of space i take up, i dont like my thighs when sitting down or my arms when flush against my torso .. i dont know what i like either, depersonalising fucks me up on another level lol
You're in the first stage of denial.
There would still be gravity. On a space station there is no gravity because you are in orbit. You are literally perpetually "falling". Gravity still has its pull to you but you are constantly just missing the planet. Here that is not the case. You're just really high up. 
Já notaram que até agora na República de Curitiba não tinha sequer UM membro do sTF, STJ ou outros tribunais delatado?  Só tem corruptos em 2 poderes da republica?
Yes, checking reddit while I do other things is worth my time to me. I don't understand what's so strange about that.
Got a mic? 
That was pretty impressive haha
don't assume that corncob's gender
Eeeeuuuugggghhhh.   That image. 
Do millennial women want to stay at home?  My wife has an MBA and is a stay at home mom, completely by her choice.
Does this guy even do basic research? US honey has no pollen because it undergoes ultrapurification, consumer preference is for non crystallized honey. Kobe beef and champagne should be defined by their taste and composition profiles, not by their origin. To call something fake while it meets scientific standards is pedantic, anyone with the slightest intelligence knows that origin based definitions are merely used as protectionist measures. Also steaks glued together, LOL. I like how this guy tries to imply that such a thing is possible on a decent cut, when in reality you will only find such a technique used on formed steaks, aka dollar store specials. This channel and its content is for retards.
Ahri Q is somewhat similar, not as bad as these, and the width is decently accurate. But the double hit range is just beyond the range indicator and is deceptive to other players too
http://steamcommunity.com/profiles/76561198333402980/ Hit me up im glad to help~!
Bulk https://imgur.com/a/1sjyi  i don't take many pics but this is somewhat recent . My overall physique is pretty trash but I maintain alot of mass on my upper back as I work my back probably too much. 
this is why i got myself a gay lifting partner!   (obv a joke, i mean he happens to be gay but obv not a factor in why i lift with him lol)
add me on steam so I can try and send you the game, might get an error since I remember steam not letting me buy stuff when not in my country
**NarshaBot 2.2 - 5/10/2016**   [**Hentai Nexus Mirror**](http://r34.tsumino.com/a/9903) - [Aggregated /r/rule34overwatch](http://r34.tsumino.com/r/rule34overwatch) - [#ReiQ](http://r34.tsumino.com/?q=ReiQ) [#Symmetra](http://r34.tsumino.com/?q=Symmetra) [#rule34overwatch](http://r34.tsumino.com/?q=rule34overwatch)   ---   Dear author/poster, if you haven't already, read the FAQ on how to tag your posts, your cooperation is appreciated!   **This bot private messages and notifies you when a tag you're subscribed to is posted.**   [*What is NarshaBot / FAQ*](http://r34.tsumino.com/Nexus/Faq) - [*Discord*](https://discord.gg/huVazmS) 
I got lucky I fed like 50 and got 5 of despair bind AH and slot
Takes a while for symptoms to develop, more than 48 hours. In the same way, it also takes a while for a HIV infection to show up as positive with a test
New knife day! And don't worry about being new, everyone around here is cool :)
I just wanted to have my elves a bit different name. The Iraq part is purely coincidental. 
I know you're getting downvoted but I totally agree with you. I've been a mechanic for only two years but fords are some of the worst things to work on (I'm looking at you TritonV8). Plus an f150 tried to take my hand off so that doesn't help.
SEND IN THA SCOTS. BEGBIES A COMIN FOR YA SPAIN. 
How does this relate to effective-altruism?
Did they add u back on Skype or did u just do it on their website
Networking and marketing yourself is a big part of realty and I'm sure Zach will do fine on that front considering his social game in the bb house. Plus he almost has 200k twitter followers so that's some decent exposure. I wish him all the best    
Tough on the back,  carrying the team in the fourth quarter. 
The big, bad, booty daddy!
In high school, there was an eccentric older man who would walk around our soccer field picking up small sticks and would wear really worn down and what looked to be second-hand clothing. He was known as the "stickman" and we assumed he was homeless. Later went to college locally and found out that he is a professor of economics and was trained at Princeton. Apparently he's just one of those eccentric intellectual types who likes to live frugally.
Not all of us are lucky enough to get matched against 3 bots in 3v3.
If you buy his shit or take his medical advice  for  children, elderly, or sick under your care, they should be taken from you.   This assuming you're just his tool, and not just defending him because you have financial interest.   Mike Adams doesn't do any valid scientific research, but feel free to link to any papers he's submitted for publishing in a scientific journal, and were peer reviewed.   Yeah, you won't, because you can't. He's not a scientist, the tons of advertising for nonsense products on his websites shows exactly what he's about. 
54407  Here's where I am http://i.imgur.com/Tnk30Js.png I circled where I've started  Go to the far bottom right and move left til you see the pink triangle, then you should see it. This thing is 11px tall and I've just finished the left border. Now creating the bottom base [like this](http://i.imgur.com/43WjmWq.png)  I'm not sure if it refreshes automatically but it's probably a good idea to refresh the page before placing to avoid placing where something was already placed  Helpful gridded version of what this thing is http://i.imgur.com/22DH3Nr.png  edit: The timer has increased to 10 minutes. Well that sucks!
There's also a bug with the cloak. Sometimes when you try to cloak, nothing happens but you need decloak and cloak again(creating an annoying and sometimes lethal cloak downtime)
Data. 
I found the similarities to Artorias as the most interesting. The cutscene was similar, the fact that he was practically overtaken by the dark soul, like how Artorias was taken by the Abyss, and even everything that was learned about the Abyss and man's relation to it in the Ringed City. 
People like you are compltely missing the point all of our old rewards are irrelevant. They are all either now free or worse than current rewards. There is a single 1 thing you can earn right now that is advantageous over earning it in 2.0 and thats master skins. Everything else is worse in the old system.
&gt;Trump's executive orders initiate a large-scale review of the causes of the US' trade deficits with some of its largest trading partners and order stricter enforcement of US anti-dumping laws to prevent foreign manufacturers from undercutting US companies by selling goods at an unfair price.  More "rah rah I'm tough on China" BS that makes middle America worship him as their literal god, but will ultimately go nowhere since it only took a single call for Pres. Jinping to make Donny 180 on his support for the One China policy.
Chum Jetze!
Hi everyone,long time lurker here.I'm taking a roadtrip from Vancouver B.C down to portland and am looking to pick up some Ul gear along the way,mainly base layers,maybe a down jacket,stuff like that.Can anyone recommend some stores I should check out where I might be able to find some good deals?
The hops xD
Go Seahawks! Rough loss to the Falcons.
I bought a cutco knife from my prom date about 20 years ago and it's still sharp and very useful. (Serrated camping knife). Were they always as bad as you describe? Are the knives bad quality or just expensive? 
We will make political cartoons great again!
This content brought to you from "TENNESSEE Pool"  &amp;nbsp;  ---  ^(This crosspost was performed automatically as a part of the ImagesOfNetwork.) [^(Learn more about the ImagesOfNetwork, how you can help, and other Frequently Asked Questions)](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_what_is_images_of.3F)^, ^or [^(visit us on Discord!)](https://discordapp.com/invite/0tZsejLgM2vzaExR)  ^([)[^("Remove my post!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_remove_my_post) ^| [^("The bot got this one wrong!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_the_bot_got_this_one_wrong) ^| [^("Stop Crossposting My Stuff!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_no_really._don.27t_ever_crosspost_me_or_my_subreddit.)  ^(])  [](#off site feed "TENNESSEE Pool")
Convenient fall guys, if you ask me. Distracting from the real culprit, whoever carelessly stored that shit under a major bridge.
inb4 the real reason they removed warp was because they couldn't figure out how to fix the warp+incendiary bug LUL
You sure you drive an altima... /s
He modified everything but the cams and connecting rods. He made it look pretty rather than make power. 
Data.
Do you know why?
Discord is pretty cool, but it's also a little confusing, so I go on once in a while to see what there is and puzzle over how discord works.
naïveté
If we can do it fast enough we can maybe get a good screenshot of it at least. Thanks for the help! Hopefully later tonight there's less traffic so we can finish it.
They can't fire her for being sick, but they can require documentation of it and fire her for lying (or falsifying, if she goes that route... and it's *very* easy to get caught).
There's a conflict that happens but you can purchase the tweak and then get it from a different source.
I could have ended up like this if I had a group of friends who fought back, I grew up in a gang invested area and my tactic was avoid avoid avoid, trouble was right around the corner to anyone asking for it
Smoking the reefer.
Sadly i don't think anyone has other then what's in the battle beyond on other maps, the scenes in the death star DLC are pre-recorded videos from what i've seen in the game files.
What happened to the lame brain who shot you?  Also, the victim?  Thanks for all you do.  Lookin good.  Much respect to law enforcement!
*As per usual Swiss hops up and brings her food to Denmark's table* "Hej Den, what do you have there?"
/r/buildapcforme
He's correct in this instance, and about a few other concepts (if only by accident), but this guy isn't a middle of the road, objective ally. He's a hardcore ____ supporter that assumes his listeners are silly enough to believe his little Hawaiian podcast is being hacked every day. How suspenseful, right!  He's just another guy with a camera, *saying stuff*--attempting to operate beyond his means, and cannot get a handle on the technical aspects. Watch out for those hackers, though!  Call in now, it may be your only shot before he's silenced. If you get through, he'll interrupt you at every turn while stroking his chin (this is to relay a sense of deep thought and inherent credibility).  There's your "truth".
Ramses.  He was about seven years old.  His mother was about 50.  They were both blond anglos from California.  You give you kid the same name as a condom, and you're telling a story to the world.  So either you're a shit (if you know), or completely dense (if you don't). 
Thanks for the helpful advice everyone!! I know now that the Red Bricks or the Towers are probably best for me.
There's no factory option to upgrade the splitter and it's not just cosmetic.  The PP has a larger chin splitter that has an aero panel underneath to prevent lift.  If you look at the bottom of the chin on a PP it's all smooth and covered back to the engine.   The standard car has a large black partition that hangs down.
It's only because it's Trump
Yeah, well I guess it does depend on the species.
**Quality Rule**  According to moderator discretion, posts/comments deemed to be deliberately antagonizing, particularly disruptive to the orderly conduct of respectful discourse, apparently uninterested in participating in open discussion, unintelligible or illegible may be removed.
Wat heilzaam! 😊😍👍👐🌞💯
The SRB's are pretty much just shells when they're recovered - solid fuel boosters aren't much more than a bunch of solid propellant in a shell. SpaceX is recovering and reconditioning not just the shell but also sophisticated composite fuel tanks and most importantly the liquid rocket engines which are a very complex and expensive system. It's a whole other ball game.
I would imagine at the anniversary 
Data.
Do his friends call him just?
that's what i figured
Vote with you dollar! That'll show em!   /s
It is.. It was reinforced and engineered against a missile strike
They're not sending their best (they are) 
A GIRL?! OMG GUYZ A GURLL!!   Just messing, it really is a shame that I won't be part of the generation that includes a substantial amount of female gamers.   Definitely a noteworthy amount, but 96% to 3% makes me sad.
They are getting rid of the bad crops first
At least this means he can't fall on his sword and say all the Russia shit was him, and Donnie/Pence were totally in the dark.
Data.
I'm so sorry that you got him. I've played with him or someone like him. I have no god damn clue how he got to platinum, that's the kind of player that belongs in that &lt;500 bracket. They won't stop playing competitive, it's how they get their kicks. Its up to Blizzard to intervene, or maybe their sense of human decency to kick in.  The only way to get past it is to know they're deeply unhappy and unloved and uncommon. Who ever that person is, he needs therapy.
What would be some examples of freer countries than the US?
You answered the question, even though I didn't ask it well. Thanks.
Can we get the lodestone freeze bug fixed? Where your character appears to be  (but isn't actually) frozen in place for a few seconds after home teleporting? 
Nothing is original, only evolved. This post isn't even its final form.
😂😍🔥👌🏽🙃😘🍑🌶❤️😩🔫💦🔞👁🙉💯💩🅱️☠️😭👶🏽😪😕😵😤👟😜💤😡😶
she loses to soldier, reaper, hanzo, roadhog, zarya, mei, winston, rein, zenyatta, ana, mccree, tracer, sombra, etc
Was it cycled already?
I've heard its good against a conq's charge.
This is very odd. Should we treat homosexuality as 'internalized sexism' because we don't see the value of women? I doubt it. You can separate in an intellectual sense the value of people, from your sexual attraction to them.
cool, let me know how it is!
I switched to OnePlus 3. Great upgrade for me, enjoy it much more then what my Nexus 5 was and still affordable.
inb4 tomorrow the content thing changes to https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dQw4w9WgXcQ
lmao do you know what BS is?
When we talk about the best players in our game he barely gets a shout . Amazing player
But I'm not presuming to know that though. 
Sexist? Why am I sexist? Not wanting to play a character any more because they happen to be gay isn't anti gay it's more I couldn't care less. Do I play more winston or offend peta? Play more lucio or offend the NAACP? Am I racist towards Asians for never having played hanzo or genji? I didn't know I had this much to consider when I play. I guess that means I need to play bastion to avoid being overly biased towards one particular group right? Since sentient robots do not exis YET, I therefore cannot offend them, thus it must be safest to play a robot character. I can't play zenyatta because he's a dude and has some severe religious overtones and orisa is a robot made by a small child so I'm not sure roborientation was programmed in. So it must be safest to play bastion 
Also good to let your nose and taste buds recover.
Me too
Im in Illinois, but our Aldi has wine.  It's actually not bad !
Why would them telling the public make whoever put the plane there more likely to go after the people on the island?
&gt;Laurier University  &gt;Highschool Education Quest  lmao
Probably thought his shame was punishment enough
Valk's had enough buffs. Her lights are faster than orochi, and they can all act as an opener. I'm not saying she's op, but she's in a good place i feel. The buff to orochi they mentioned - i don't know, orochi feels very well rounded at the moment. 
I'm expecting them now smushed into a little clown car. :P
HES THE BEST.... AROUND....
What about huge male butts? 
Cool I'll check your channel out! I agree SFF/Penny Lane are better tunes, but they came out around 8 months before the eventual Magical Mystery Tour did, so if anything I think they should have been on Sgt. Pepper.
You won't have a choice soon. 
Interesting. How difficult is it to get the EIN that you need? 
Data.
Its not april fools for scott yet i live close to him 
I think i just realised why askreddit is my favourite place on earth. 
Anything is possible if your lights have the function and you have a control panel capable of supporting that. 
Ashe's ult? You mean Varus q.
People like it when other people name cities they've never been to.
Seems like most men like B. I gotta get to B. 
&gt; 2 hr  2 hours and 52 minutes.  Stop exaggerating.  This 1 hour 45 minute method is a significant improvement on that.
I couldn't find [[Iain Sterling]]. I'm really sorry.   [Data Dealer](https://netrunnerdb.com/card_image/01031.png) - [NetrunnerDB](https://netrunnerdb.com/en/card/01031)  ***** Beep Boop. I am Clanky, the ANRBot.   [ [About me] ](https://www.reddit.com/r/anrbot/wiki) [ [Contact] ](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=just_doug&amp;subject=ANRBot)
3.00 for shipping 
My point is if they can make a sports game into a jrpg is it that far of a stretch to use a pun of the name hypothetically for a point and click? 
I agree. They dont seem like they are going to be a threat to our bottom right corner and I hate red more anyway!
Stuff that funnel, knock em down. 
To add a little bit here. There is another natural correspondence between AxA and A^2, where the latter is again interpreted as a set of functions (this time from {0,1} to A. Same goes for A^n vs. AxAx...xA n-fold, where in the former n={0,1,2,...,n-1}.
A song for the deaf, that is for you
"7TH! COLUMN!" And "FIIGGGHHHTTTT FOREVAAAAA GUARDIAN! "
I play so dam slow, lol. I wouldn't be able to make the crosses with no awakenings
Loved it, its all the beauty of high tiers (Modern Tanks, Stabilizers High Caliber ROF guns etc.) but with ARMOR THAT CANT ACTUALLY SAVE YOU!
Very cool.
This content brought to you from "Virginia Pool"  &amp;nbsp;  ---  ^(This crosspost was performed automatically as a part of the ImagesOfNetwork.) [^(Learn more about the ImagesOfNetwork, how you can help, and other Frequently Asked Questions)](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_what_is_images_of.3F)^, ^or [^(visit us on Discord!)](https://discordapp.com/invite/0tZsejLgM2vzaExR)  ^([)[^("Remove my post!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_remove_my_post) ^| [^("The bot got this one wrong!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_the_bot_got_this_one_wrong) ^| [^("Stop Crossposting My Stuff!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_no_really._don.27t_ever_crosspost_me_or_my_subreddit.)  ^(])  [](#off site feed "Virginia Pool")
Many other games have a grace period after a disconnect.  And crashing to desktop is a disconnect++   As there is no scaling in ME:A MP, loosing a player might upset the balance and make it harder.   But at the same time... it can't be that hard (even if it does mean more work) to balance MP based on how many people are up and shooting/facestabbing and make it possible to re-connect within a set time.   Hell for good measures give us ingame chat too.
Pain in the ass, oh well I guess
Come on Blender wake the fuck up
Damn, it's kinda like a zombie apocalypse for skin cells. When they realize that they're damaged or infected, they go to any means to kill themselves off to prevent the spread, but there will be that one defiant Cell who doesn't do it and proceeds to spread the infection to the other cells until it is all too late.
Should be an interesting show. Can't wait to see what Cornette says.
Brave is supposedly a good browser, super secure and stuff, but there aren't many addons, especially in terms of adblockers
If you're using the Giuliani scale they have to be at *least* a 9/11.
The book makes so much more sense than the drama version of the ending... Lmiyd 
RIP u weird little dude :(
There is not a lot of random baby stealing going on.  
Hi `fayesimmons`. Thank you for participating in /r/Politics. However, [your submission](https://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/62oyb5/federal_judge_oks_25_million_trump_u_settlement/) has been removed for the following reason(s):  * **Paywall** - Articles that require users to take a survey, or to enter any information in order to view material, or to become a paid subscriber are not allowed. If you have any questions about this removal, please feel free to [message the moderators.](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=/r/politics&amp;subject=Question regarding the removal of this submission by /u/fayesimmons&amp;message=I have a question regarding the removal of this [submission.](https://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/62oyb5/federal_judge_oks_25_million_trump_u_settlement/?context=10000\))
Awesome! I loved the first one.
My buddy in silver had a very astute observation which I think applies to plat &amp; below: "This game just teaches people how to displace blame onto others." That's been my experience of the lower ranks as well (and I'm not immune).
It is one million percent respectful. He loves it and so do the fans.
I thought that the new EPA dude allows this, along with shooting from helicopters and gassing wolf and bear dens. If so, it's not just MN's asshole we have to worry about. 
THEM AGAIN ? SHUT EM UP ONCE MORE.   GOO BUCKS GO.
I drive from downtown to my home in Capilano, maybe we've crossed paths!
That one example is why liberals are more dishonest? C'mon liberal bro, Trump is dishonest with almost every word he spews and the Republican party dishonestly pushes corporate favoring legislation at every turn by claiming it's about economic freedom for the people. Democrats are dishonest too, sure, but not nearly as much. Your view is myopic.
Is this what Joss Whedon's going to base the movie on?
Go get it
Amazing work dude
thanks for the input. do you have a different rec for a laptop for a graphic artist?
I'm not a conspiratard by any means but... watching the other planes hit the towers you can very clearly see the shape of the wings made a hole spanning 3 or 4 floors, punching through the exterior steel columns that served as the "exoskeleton" of the WTC. I get that the Pentagon is a much sturdier building but seeing no damage where the wings supposedly hit does make you wonder.
what even is this offense by the nuggets 
Love the strategic placement of Bring it on before this challenge
don't worry.. we never have anyone in the slot paying attention to score..
Yup! It has a delay, so leave it on for a few seconds.
[Sure Gamble](https://netrunnerdb.com/card_image/01050.png) - [NetrunnerDB](https://netrunnerdb.com/en/card/01050)  ***** Beep Boop. I am Clanky, the ANRBot.   [ [About me] ](https://www.reddit.com/r/anrbot/wiki) [ [Contact] ](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=just_doug&amp;subject=ANRBot)
.. It's fucking scary. Mania comes round faster every year. In April, it'll be five years since Brock returned.
Legitimate option. Looking very dangerous as of late and decent fixtures/DGWs coming up as mentioned.
Will do!  I've read that the camera can be modified and you can run scripts to get different things. Might be something of interest: [Link](http://nutseynuts.blogspot.ca/2015/06/xiaomi-yi-action-cam-custom-scripts.html)
The mods there were pretty good though. They saw how abhorrent that place was and shut their baby down once Hillary was officially the nominee. 
Betting markets are decent predictors of outcomes, because people have an economic incentive to calculate the odds as accurately as possible.  Betting markets use available information, at any given time. If new information comes to light, the odds change. The election was a shitshow because new information came out immediately before the election: Comey said he reopened the Clinton investigation. That was exactly what tipped it, with just enough votes to flip the very close rustbelt states.
Should I even upgrade from my 530W PSU? What about overclocking?
It became a spoiler when you said it was, until then it was just random.
Wish I could be there. Be safe
His wife definitely is, her family still lives there and he visits them frequently in offseasons. 
i don't get it  edit: wait, was it little jimmy?
its 5 to 1 ratio on the upvotes and a 1 to 1 ratio on the downvotes.   Spez, just noticed the sand in the photo. oh my god i now hate sand
One thing, I really don't think you accrued just 3% surely as DIS price is up nearly 600% since 2000. Not to mention steady dividends which will add to your performance. You do need to diversify though so I would suggest downloading Robinhood and heading over to /r/stocks and /r/Robinhood.
The number is completely changed as well.  They're lying to someone.
There is not much about it. We know Theion had two and one was murdered to make him Malfeas. That the soul was called Ruvelia. I don't rember where but Ligier was also suspicious about Malfeas doing something and the write up of the weird demon baby is on an Ink Monkey blog about Infernal Manses and is called "Transcendent Blossom of the Emerald Dawn". It hints at being a new fetich but it could be something else if you want to. It's more of a possible plot point than any sort of hard statement.
I just caught wind of Brenda after hearing her sing "Monday Monday" on Harry Belafonte's "paradise in gazankulu" album. Vulindlela gets me so pumped.   She's so good. So much soul. Unfortunately there's not much on Spotify, my usual source for music.  If anyone can recommend me a CD or something to buy, that's be awesome 
It's strong. I hit legend with a lighter list this season. As long as there is aggro this archetype will do fine. 
You're not the only one. In fact, most people hated it when it was launched and was deemed a total failure. It seems that it has gained somewhat of a cult following in the course of time.   Personally, I loved it for the first time I saw it at the theatre on 1997. It has it's flaws, but god... so creepy and atmospheric.
/r/moviecirclejerk
Really considered getting his card but i got his live series card for the loyalty reward and have done nothing with it, his defense is incredible though.  i am personally going for Posada and David Wright
A lot of average coffee to be had. 
You can get an infection from uterine inflammation from a decaying fetus in your uterus and become septic. The fetal tissue will also ossify and have to be surgically removed and you'll have uterine scarring that will make further pregnancy more complicated. The physical reality of this is very different than this shitbag thinks.   What the fuck is up with the alt Reich thinking women are disposable fetus vessels? It's YOUR BODY, you dumb buggers. 
True I hang my head in shame every day.
This map is awesome....... someone please figure out what it's called.
If only they would substitute it with dog flavor, then we would have something!
If you're in ketosis and very fat adapted, is there an advantage eating 5 net carb over 30 net carb even if it doesn't kick you out of ketosis? Just wondering 
[Whampoa Reclamation](https://netrunnerdb.com/card_image/12079.png) - [NetrunnerDB](https://netrunnerdb.com/en/card/12079)  ***** Beep Boop. I am Clanky, the ANRBot.   [ [About me] ](https://www.reddit.com/r/anrbot/wiki) [ [Contact] ](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=just_doug&amp;subject=ANRBot)
I just want to point out that standard wow is not the same thing as starter edition. Starter is free but caps you at level 20, standard caps you at 100.
Interested in white zombas and keys? If so, how many?
You did your best!
I'm just sayin' ;)
I like Boogie, but I'm hoping Willie goes off like he did against Denver after the All-Starbreak. 
Yeah, he's never really admitted he's wrong, but he has stated that Maroon is having a great season and is playing really well.
originalhobbes - professional guardian
I am also anxiously awaiting *Devilman: crybaby*, and I'm glad to here they're not changing the ending. The ending of *Devilman* was a strange experience for me.   On the one hand, it was a *fresh* experience; I haven't consumed very many stories that end with the hero completely, utterly failing in the end. On the other hand, it just leaves a bitter taste in my mouth that no matter how hard Akira fought, he couldn't defeat the demons and save humanity.  It wasn't a *disappointing* experience per se, but it was definitely a very depressing one. I wouldn't change it of course; the entire narrative falls apart without humanity losing in the end.  Out of curiosity(as you say *Devilman* is one of your favorite stories) was there anything you *didn't* like about the series?  Also I'm assuming you've read both sequel series *Devilman Lady* and *Violence Jack*. I've heard good things and bad things about both of these series, and I was wondering if you would recommend them. I am especially interested in reading *Violence Jack*.
Corey Graves wife wins
I'm still new with Java, but you didn't set the type of window manager for your JPanel.   If you want all that whitespace, you're gonna have to use a gridbag layout.  Of course,I could be completely off
Sounds absolutely splendid! 
OP seems pretty angry on the comments of this thread.  As for you saying it's a joke, I didn't say if it was or wasn't.
I think a lot of people tried it when it first came out and was pretty bare bones. They played for a bit and dropped it because they were done. Destiny has become leagues better since then but to them it's just that crappy game with missed potential. So they rage and think they're right because they don't want to put in the effort of giving it another chance or just don't care to 
No, I haven't.  Well you asked.
C.B. Murdoc is very creative, and Replacire released a pretty good album.
We all know what that is. But hell ill click it anyways
Hello
Mrsamsa,   Sorry to bust you like this. Just doing my job. There's absolutely zero, nil evidence for the bunko wanderings you've stated above. The fact that Sam Harris is a neuroscientist is not a debate. The only reason it is questioned is because there are people, as the op article shows, religious zealots and academic naysayers, who would love to take Harris down a peg in any way possible.   http://journals.plos.org/plosone/article?id=10.1371/journal.pone.0007272  Last time we spoke was on a more ethereal, immeasurable, but equally outrageous claim; Whether or not Harris is a racist. Another common baseless detracting smear. All you have boils down to essentially, "I don't think Sam Harris is a neuroscientist, even though he *is* technically a neuroscientist, because I dedicate a big part of my time defaming Sam Harris, so I'd really feel better if he wasn't credible. I'm wired to politely shitpost about the guy." No Ad Hominem. You've just been thoroughly busted. That is all. Carry on. All the best.   signed,  -cb
Nah, we are not bothering the Finns. We helped them built up at first actually, the spiral might eat it up though.
What?
Thank you! I think i'm still in shock rn xd 
Post up at the end game bosses and go hang out at fume knight....
Yeah, It's the automod, i removed it for now until i can set it the way i want it
ive got a ST 32@ already ebugg'd not sure on a price though and ill check on Defense
Gladly you ignore the dozens of philanthropies they all setup? They tens of thousands they all raise each semester and year for good causes?  Conveniently focusing on the negatives. What a way to live. 
*sniffs. Wimpers softly...* Thank you.
And the M. Knight Shamalayan TWIST:  they end up proving ghosts ARE real...
Pedes, it was my attempt at dry humor!  Too dry?  Guess I should practice more.  MAGA!
This content brought to you from "Virginia Pool"  &amp;nbsp;  ---  ^(This crosspost was performed automatically as a part of the ImagesOfNetwork.) [^(Learn more about the ImagesOfNetwork, how you can help, and other Frequently Asked Questions)](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_what_is_images_of.3F)^, ^or [^(visit us on Discord!)](https://discordapp.com/invite/0tZsejLgM2vzaExR)  ^([)[^("Remove my post!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_remove_my_post) ^| [^("The bot got this one wrong!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_the_bot_got_this_one_wrong) ^| [^("Stop Crossposting My Stuff!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_no_really._don.27t_ever_crosspost_me_or_my_subreddit.)  ^(])  [](#off site feed "Virginia Pool")
The more and more I read about Sevilla, the more impressed I become of how efficiently their club is run. Can any more knowledgable Sevilla fans speak for how their front office is? Do you guys ever complain about anything?
culture differences are certainly worth considering.
I don't understand this
Even in real life lmao, solar is tricky but once it's been converted it's the same
Never saw this one before, easily my favorite though
And I think the battlefield crowd would have adapted well to that. 
Blandisi.. dude.
Which, so far, has been a really refreshing part of this manga. Most of the time when we saw scenes like that in part 1 it was only really during filler.
&gt;rand must also be very consistent in delivering at a certain level of quality that is reflective of that brand's place in the marketplace.  Not quite. It just has to be *perceived* to be quality. If the rich people who buy it will treat it as if it's disposable anyway and the fact that it's low quality won't *actually* matter. 
I can, cause this is a repost.
Thanks very much for the insight.  I really appreciate it.
I actually want to destroy most of my cards in play to get value, but wouldnt mind if my opponent play Elta.
We live     To serve
HEY! Why u expanding in our corner.... not cool guys... 
Rooney is still such an interesting player to put in the mix for these types of games. I know he's got a hattie in him still but he's lost so much confidence and speed, idk if we'll see him come out blasting ever again
But did they have emails that is the real question
For sure I'll message you when I get home
sounds like spez has a twin
Just another ideologue blinded by hate, he is.
Data.
Removing supposed bad guys from political power has never turned out bad before.   I mean if we don't like other peoples governments we should just kill them and install people we like. No big deal.  Oh yeah! Don't forget! fuck the russians! they were trying to influence or electionzzzzz!!!!! I need MUH RUSSIA BLOOD NOWWWWW!
Jerry would sue the shit out of you if he got wind of this game.  Delete post, finish it, and release it into the wild before we all cry.
Thank you road
Likely not very easy. It is incredibly slow and you only get an extra turn for it. While an extra turn is big, you probably could just not play this card and have a more efficient deck.
Our name has passed his hallowed lips... We're not worthy 
No matter where you go, there's always that one neckbeard.
Fuck suburbs 
Here my question. Our names aren't tied to the data, but isn't our address, geo location, ISP provider, IP, and a lot of other information available in which we can infer identities, so advertisers don't need names. This is a good idea just to f over advertisers. Tailoring ads leads to tailoring news stories, a lot of stories are ads, and lots of Fox News is fake. Knowing you browse Fox News in your neighborhood probably means your buy gold from the radio and I can probably guess which way you'll vote and therefore lobby businesses to your area to "help" you out. Do names matter?
Why does this start on April Fool's day?
Done
So much Clutcherer recently!
It never starts...
this sort of propaganda is what keeps all colors from achieving true peace. do not fall for this deception.
I live in Tucson, and know members of her family. Alot of people say her father had ties with the cartel and owed them money, so they think the cartel had something to do with it, or her father gave her to them :( 
SCREAMS
&gt; I can't understand your argument.  Youre either deliberately misreading my original comment or you missed some words.  You also refused to address how an infrastructure improvement initiative would do anything but bring corporate welfare the way Trump plans to implement it, which IMO is whats important since it will be the closest thing we will get to the solution youre trying to propose with this administration and that is the issue at hand, both for the sake of argument and practicality.
This link points to an ebook that is no longer free (current price: $2.99), and consequently has been marked as expired.  I am a bot. If I have made a mistake, please message the moderators.
so keys aren't considered property where you live? if a thief steals keys and "chucks them in the road" doesn't that "permanently deprive" the owner of the key? what if the key chain he took had house keys on it? or keys to a safe? are those not considered property?
They call him a terrorist and compare him to bill Clinton because he liked to fuck 
He's actually a beautiful man who i wouldn't mind to get fisted by.
I really like your art style. How do you decide what to make next? 
trash
Endo for purple zombas ? 
He is charging people to be there, so when it's a business then it can be a bit of a concern. Obviously, it's their own choice to be there and I'm pretty sure there is a waiver that you have to sign. All the bases are covered. He can't be legally held responsible for anyone that gets hurt, but that police officer is also fully within his rights to say "this is a shitty, nasty, and dangerous place for teenagers to be hanging around"  Mostly, it's just an interesting story, but nothing will or can be changed here. It's all legal
How in flying fuck do those stay in her shirt
California's system of irrigation is rapidly desertifying the region, much like how the ancient Mesopotamians did in the middle east. Land is too flat for drainage + too much high mineral water being pumped in + evaporation leaving salts behind X a few centuries = unarable land.  We never learn from history or listen to scientists.
[Here you go](http://www.pakistankakhudahafiz.com/pkkhnew/wp-content/uploads/2016/02/Gold-bullion-vault.jpg) 
who says he is ignorant? who says he needs "helping"? why do you feel as if your way of thinking is superior to his?  This is exactly what I am talking about. The need to label any opinion that differs from yours as "ignorant"  The dude isn't hurting anyone. he isn't spuing hate speech.   stop believing that your way of thinking is the "right way" we are ALL wrong including myself
I don't want to spoil to much, but it is his name and they have a connected past... but not like SAC and Kuze isn't like the Kuze from SAC XD.  It's... strange.  I really liked Michael Pitt's portrayal, I didn't like the writing of the character though.
This headline was in answer to question how they react of Trump required them to make their clothes in the US.
PIA is great, I haven't had any issues.
Every time she tastes a food that she likes: she nods once and then rocks her head side to side happily.  
is English not your first language? not being offensive just asking.  "not trying to burst your bubble" in this case is just him saying he doesn't mean to ruin the hope you have buuuut he gave you info that may be disheartening to hear.  also is there a reason you wanna play duscae so badly?
Stop buying stuff.
No
all good. :(
So I recently came back to burn all my tickets and lapis because of the Orlandeau banner and was extremely fortunate to pull 2 Orlandeau and 2 Olives.  I was wondering, is a bad idea to put all four of them in my "end game" team? It seems like a shame to not try to use them to the fullest. What would be the best party for me to go with?  Other notable 6 star units I have are: Lightning, Elza, Ling, Chizuru, Firion, CoD, Butts, Cecil, Refia, Minfilia, Yshtola, Ariana, Warrior of Light (future 6*?)  I only have 1 dual wield atm, but I have enough copies of other characters to give everyone double hand, excaliburs, sakurafubuki, and blade mastery.  Also is there a character I should try to aim for now or in the future that would really complete my potential team (besides Ramza and more dual wields)?  Any insight would be appreciated, thanks!
[](/mirrorportal)[Imgur mirror](http://imgur.com/bI4XMUc)   ---   ^(This is a bot | )[^Info](/r/mylittlepony/comments/1lwzub/deviantart_imgur_mirror_bot_nightmirrormoon/)^( | )[^(Report problems)](/message/compose/?to=&amp;subject=)^( | )[^(Source code)](https://github.com/meditonsin/NightMirrorMoon)  ---   ^(If you would like to avoid seeing notifications from this bot, )[^(please request a PM so that you can block it.)](/message/compose/?to=&amp;subject=)
Bin in den USA, hier ist erst 8 uhr abends. Ich pass auf euch auf leute.
OH shit.
&gt;but the majority of OTPs wont play like shit in those situations  Yes they would. Even the best pharah players switch after being hardcountered by people of equal skill level on two counters.  &gt;You named all hitscan characters when torb is a projectile hero. Torb's gun is totally different than S76 and McCree, and the skills do not translate well. You want someone who can't play Reaper or Soldier well to play those heroes instead of someone they can perform well on.  Sure, but they play quite similarly, it's not like you can't play hitscan heroes if you know how to use Torb's gun.   &gt;Attack torbjorn is inefficient but it can work. The key here is that it is inefficient  Nobody is saying it can't work, we're saying if it doesn't and you're clearly performing badly, you should switch.  You're either a retarded OTP main yourself, or you don't understand the game enough that swapping characters when being countered is a worthwhile strategy if you're behind.  You're trying too hard to say good OTP's can make their hero shine in every situation, which might be true for very few circumstances, but often you're going to get shit on no matter how good you are because hard counters exist.  You can believe in magical OTP's that can perform incredibly well in games they're shut out from, and thats cool. The rest of us are realistic and know for a fact it doesn't work in 99.9% off circumstances, or unless there's a massive skill disparity - Which often in ranked there isn't, you're playing people as good as you are.
Here, what is that song in the background?! I know I know it but can't put my finger on what it is! 
Mods this is unbearable change it back
Ersekar tingellon me bukur
Yes, just in case you didn't see the upvotes. You can also see the wave picking up one chunk of the ice. 
:( I hope it goes away and you go on remission for a long time
so i should just reverse the range?
After Starladder 9. PPD was really impressed with Envy standing in for Fear IIRC and offered him a spot.
I just invited you, My psn is SixGodStebs
Yep, my brother mostly won until he took himself out of the running because we would all get annoyed at him. My parents retired the Golden Present not long after because they didn't think it was fair for  my brother to be left out.
Thank you! I love barley and the kind of wine Jesus made.
Poeltl was making Turner look like reboudning savant
A potato
Reeses also makes herpes break out. Better never eat it again!
was expecting fisting,  sadly dissatisfied 
Thread not working!
Eat them?
Funny, we were all thinking the same thing
Inverse your dd
Haha fair enough, I'll watch it again tomorrow. I've only seen it once 
Well there was a couple liberal reporters that were prepping their audiences 2 weeks ago that "there may not be anything to this Russian story"
u r noticed
april fools?
The bitches from Compton done brought it on, I ain't even mad
I'm pretty confident the v mount is a type of portable battery. That must just mean you have the option of throwing one of those brick batteries on the back instead of plugging it in. 
Welcome [Brother!](https://youtu.be/Pk9CLicNyIg)
John let Brian record almost everything he said. What do you think he thought was going to happen with it? John enjoyed the attention and now his name will live on forever. 
we're back. a dragon's story.
sometimes it's people's only option, too. i drive an old truck and rough country was the least shitty option for me, decent kit, not a fan of the shocks though...
Considering he's so disappointed getting Naruto's card, it's 100% Sasuke for sure. 
I don't think so, I just checked and I'm not seeing it.
The third point
Yeah, I was wondering about this too.  Too bad it's apparently not soon.
Let's go buckss
Somethings fishy about them not talking.  I thought Ruby rose to the occasion to start a conversation with Blake but it was just a clone.  Blake would talk to Ruby more but she's such a scaredy cat in social situations.
Wendy Williams waving back, it's like a ~~dream~~nightmare come true!
It won't take *that* long.
Anything cinema involving women is never mentioned nor upvoted. No women favorite characters, quotes, actresses, theory, directors, writers. In this sub, there are no ovaries.  Also, the discussion about the Netflix adaption of 5 Came Back. Everyone circlejerked about the directors of our time, del Toro, Spielberg being interviewed, but no one gave a shit about the directors the book/doc. is about like Capra, Ford, or Huston! It made me wish there was a sub for real cinema lovers... without sounding as elitist as I just did.  Edit: oh and the redditors who bitched on that 5 Came Back thread that Meryl Streep was narrating, not Tom Hanks GTFO. Should be banned and shot.
id rather have NFCN incest continue
Let them ban everyone who has ever said a mean thing about them or might ever say a mean thing about them online. There will be nobody left in chat. They can kill their own stream that way and then blame it on reddit.
If any of you go studdering into a car dealership like that (Toyota commercial) prepare to have your ass handed to you
I got the joke it just wasn't funny. 
The "rent a white guy" thing isn't nearly as common nowadays, and it was never as widespread as lots of people think either. I've been here for over 3 years in a tier 3 city and have never been offered a "job" like that.
chips nd smokes, trevor. let's go.
Would definitely not kick that ass outta bed.
Him and McCain have no beef with Saudi Arabia at all. They also like the MEK, which was classified as a terrorist organization for decades, because they happen to terrorize Iran. Recently hosted a MEK speaker in the capitol.
Ya mommy 
🤣 I was sure this was someone else mocking you; but no, it's really you. 
9.5(2)10 with 301 days of up time. Whew!
Target! :) 
Can we please have notifications on mobile fixed? I'm the N card and you're SSR, make tech guys hear ya.
I'm not telling Putin...
Honestly, just keep fighting. This is supposed to be a war of attrition. If YouTube remains an influential platform in spite of the media pressure, advertisers will have no choice but to relent or lose out on an insanely huge market.
monk starts with innas, so monk?
did it http://i.imgur.com/AKMkqMz.png
3.00
Bout time somebody said it. I bought a Hasbro Nick Fury and while he looks great, his durability is crap. Of course, that's just one bad experience out of an entire line of figures so I'd need a few more before casting full judgement. But I do enjoy the more gritty look of the Toy Biz Legends.
Max Kuma! You will hit a wall if you don't do so. I'm talking from experience.
So tired. I doze off in the middle of anything pretty much, or I'm distracted while doing any tasks. Husband wanted to go see a movie today but even just the thought of committing to sitting still for 2 hours sounded so unappealing to me :(. Just want to roll around on the couch and drink juice.
It's said that two of his greatest graces were not having any problem with sexual sin and being promised to be never made a bishop.
It got Park, Geun-hye impeached this year...
I bet you're a real blue collar, lunch pail kind of guy, coach's son, first one in every morning, last one out every evening... even though you don't have freakish athleticism you win with hustle and heart and high football IQ, and of course you're passionate yet high character, a locker room leader, and have all the intangibles. 
When we win we're partying it up in Vegas. It's gonna happen.
[Kyrie spins it off the glass](https://streamable.com/roajn)
This comment has been reported for violating the rule for comments:  &gt;Top-level responses must make a sincere effort to present at least the most common two perceptions of the issue or controversy in good faith, with sympathy to the respective side.  I think the issue here is whether you have in fact in good faith engaged in "sympathy" for the "no" side.   It does seem to be phrased quite sarcastically.   Consider whether this was really your best, good-faith effort to portray how someone on the "no" side would seek to persuade others as to the correctness of their position.
~~I feel like some of the images there are NSFW. You probably should tag it accordingly xD~~  Either way, some of the fanarts there are really good.
Another zzr bites the dust :(  Those are amazing bikes btw
Would be cool, but there making the next Star Wars battlefront this year so, it dosent seem legit.  Edit: just read the whole thing and this is completely fake.
She was likable, educated and qualified. The same people who had issues with Obama being black, have issues with women. Oh and the whole Russia interference thing
Nice attempt, a bit too much for my taste tho. If you take a look at your builds, you have like **three** main block-types that are used. Your path however takes **seven** different materials with variations.  If you want your path to fit into your surrounding, it has to blend in more. My suggestion on blocks: &gt; Stone, Andesite (+polished), ~~Stone Slab~~, ~~Stone Bricks~~, Cobble, ~~Podzol~~ Coarsed Dirt  And to blend in the path, use coarsed dirt on the edges to break them up. In addition to that I would suggest plants next to the walkway, just some bonemeal and bushes made out of leaves (like you placed those rocks) help a lot.  Keep it up!
Don't worry bud, some of us got you. 
Puyo Puyo Tetris Demo from the Japanese eShop. Absolutely worth every penny of the $0!
Try using bis_fnc_findSafePos. It will shift the spawn points a bit but you should be safer that way.
Six Feet Under, Westworld, Justified, Banshee just to name a few..
Alien weakness is great paired with a powerful strike tile spammer.  Being able to double down on those tiles is great
Add what?
I feel like u can get that effect by just fking around with the envelope of the pad and perhaps setting it to a macro for later automation. Imma go experiment and get back to you
So home of record just means the state? like I joined out of Oregon and now I'm in Kentucky, so they will pay for me to go back to Oregon from Kentucky? 
What's 'better' is subjective 
Progressive insurance just paid me 10k to fix a 12k motorcycle and THEY DID NOT TOTAL IT
Done. Sold. That's a wrap.
That was actually quite nice.
McCaw has pretty decent potential and I'm excited about his future, but he has hit the rookie wall big time. He is the lowest impact player on the team and at times it's almost like playing 4 on 5 on both ends of the floor. 
Maybe I'll do some more later
We don't become a different person, we are still the same. It is who we are. We love our authentic selves rather than what others choose to see. 
I like Robot Part 1 the most, to be honest. Maybe the EP is a cop-out, but I don't really care. "Your eyes are bleeding..."
[Cake decorating](http://m.imgur.com/KcjV873)
Genocide against punctuation-kin, obviously.
What the heck is that damage scaling?
Owwch. So you read 'practicing' in what that dude said. Somehow. You also assume really awful things way too quickly. Like it or not, the guy is right.  Also don't throw around the mighty 'But if you aren't helping your team, it's a bannable offense'. It's not a god-damn bannable offense not to pick a god-damn healer even if there's just one. It's a bannable offense to PLAY poorly INTENTIONALLY, not to pick poorly intentionally.
Thanks for your advice :)
Counting sort is `O(n+k)` since it runs a loop bounded by `k` and a loop bounded by `n`. A loop bounded by `k` has running time `O(k)` and a loop bounded by `n` has running time `O(n)`, so overall the function would be `O(n+k)`
P.S. Sorry for the format guys. I do not post images a lot and I use the android app "RedditisFun" to browse. MAGA - 6,000,000 pedes and counting!
Which one fits in the Conair? Got a link??
Yes and we would appreciate help moving. We were here first after all.
His name is monkjungle on instagram 
Hmm...what about  Joss  Joyce  Jocelyn  Jolie  and a few other J names  Juliana  Janis  Jacqueline  Jacinda
That can has little chance of exploding too, the lighter is far enough from the nozzle and the spray itself is coming out at such pressure that it really is working like a little flamethrower. If the propellant was thicker like a gelatin it would burn longer which would make it an *actual* little flamethrower.
[Mario is dead and we killed him.](https://i.imgur.com/tmwxGtf.png)
Nothing in NW Ohio / SE Michigan
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YfjTZLxekig
i don't want to die lol jk
Angeblich werden die beiden LVAs ab dem kommenden Semester eingestellt und durch eine neue LVA, die beides abdeckt, ersetzt!
Thanks.  I'll have to check out 107.5
"Seriously" and "honestly"... too much. It just makes her sound insincere 
I shave every other day and get 3 or 4 shaves per blade.
Bird: 3x MVP, 2x Finals MVP, 12x All-Star, 10x All-NBA (9x First Team), 3x All-Defensive  Duncan: 2x MVP, 3x Finals MVP, 15x All-Star, 15x All-NBA (10x First Team), 15x All-Defensive (8x First Team)
N.E.R.D - provider
We just had it happen to us. Basically we were up 2-0, lost round 3, but timer just stuck on 40 secs with our 3 orbs down.   Mexican standoff ensues, but then probably 20 mins I I get kicked for inactivity. My other 2 teammates are still sat there now waiting it out. 
To be fair Britain treated Ireland pretty horribly.
Kill Bill
What I do is I puree the fruit, and then heat it on the stove with a   little of the must while stirring continuously to 185 degrees and keep it there for 15 minutes. Let it cool in the fridge and then pour it in when it is cool. 
  Democrats  were so  sure they had it in the bag? They were so cocky about it? And then look what happened. I see that happening with the  Republicans
[](/mirrorportal)[Imgur mirror](http://imgur.com/fynL74J)   ---   ^(This is a bot | )[^Info](/r/mylittlepony/comments/1lwzub/deviantart_imgur_mirror_bot_nightmirrormoon/)^( | )[^(Report problems)](/message/compose/?to=&amp;subject=)^( | )[^(Source code)](https://github.com/meditonsin/NightMirrorMoon)  ---   ^(If you would like to avoid seeing notifications from this bot, )[^(please request a PM so that you can block it.)](/message/compose/?to=&amp;subject=)
Or she likes eats it in half and passes the other to Steven so Steven has to awkwardly sip it out of the bottle like a watermelon
"Supporting" the best team in Scotland, wow you're special!!  
Probably prince, nance would be a decent option steals
Holy hell, a while not her year has gone by! Happy Birthday Norse! 
If I throw in 190 Vesta would that sweeten the deal?   
The only reason we have the ACA is because democrats didn't want single payer or a public option. Blue dog dems refuses to support single payer or a public option so we got this.  I thought it was common knowledge that they oppose single payer as well. Hillary even attacked Obama during the primaries because he supported single payer and the rest of the party didn't. 
Exit Light   Enter night 
I've got your back mang! 100% dedicated to the preservation of your legacy!!
Lowery wasn't garbage, Mccoil got beat....a lot. We also ran a 3-4 meaning they would have to run Liuget at DT.  Not sure where you are getting this stuff from lol.
Disagree
Okay, now stickied on sub.
My name jeff
Decklist or it didn't happen.
....How much time did you guys spend on this? 
The only gay romance option is a half-assed NPC that looks like one of the background characters from the Nexus.
The code will likely be sent to your Xbox inbox or your email inbox closer to when the early access is live.
PURPLES WE MUST PUSH THROUGH
I did not think that. I think we are very lucky.
i feel you man
Only if he submits a list of everything he feeds the kid every day. In which case, he can't win no matter what, because bitch be crazy. 
i had a '12 xB in Alberta.   here's my take on the car. enormous interior space,  at the cost of trunk space. was a joy hauling around a wife and two kids.  but thats it. we struggled on camping trips and Costco runs. nothing too invasive,  but we made it work. with the backseat down, its F'n huge.  Great in the winter, I had Blizzaks and a 5speed manual. great fun to Ebrake drift around small turns. i test drove the 4speed auto, and it was gutless. the manual lets me get off the line really strong at lights, and even screech the tires if i wanted.  Highway driving is very quiet and comfortable. but here's the thing,  very short fuel range. like 450km to a tank on the highway. and the wind will push you around a bit.  the guages are in the center so that may take some getting used to. i remember when i signaled left, the light started blinking to my right, and it felt really weird. like i was signaling the wrong way. but its really no big deal.   all in all, i miss my xB. great car. spacious, but still really easy to park. i would still have it if it werent that i needed a truck for work. driving around in my Tacoma, xBs still make me do a double take. and reminds me of when my kids were babies.
Thanks for the eggs! I'll hatch to confirm their shininess as soon as possible. Thanks for being incredibly patient with me! XDDDD
I've been playing a zombie survival game called Infestation that is pretty solid for a free-to-play.
No. 
I shoulda added REEEE, for clarity. I agree with you. An ideology is a form of stereotype. It's like saying "this is my ideology, please stereotype me as this" 
I have my theory that the shot wont be in the final film at all.
You can think all you want when watching the movie, the questions are still there, there's just no visual cue as to when you are supposed to think about it. The question of self when you're in a machine body is literally the point of the film. There's just no boat ride to tell you when to start thinking about those themes.
Before I met my SO and after. We knew each other for years and have a long history, he's the best thing that ever happened to me
When my friend's backs are turned I douse them in gasoline and light them on fire.
**First time reading through thoughts**  Jumpin' Jack Flash is a stupid name, but I've always been a sucker for gravity control. It has a decent punch ghost. Reminds me of The Hand a little bit. It's neat that it can use its gauntlets to shoot stuff.   I'm liking how Weather Report uses Weather Report. I was fully expecting it to be used for creating rain and lightning and nothing else.  I like how direct Weather Report is compared to Jolyne. He might be one of my top five characters if he keeps up like this.  I love the space suits made of clouds. It was just completely unexpected.  This is certainly an interesting fight, at least. I wouldn't say I love it, but it isn't bad.
leave me a PM
How much is amtrak? I feel like that would be super expensive
Damn, this match is all over the place. Roger is back in control.
***N*** is for anywhere anytime at all down here in the deep blue sea! Now you try it!
As a Pharah main, being told to swap because there's hitscan on the enemy team triggers me.  Of the infinity number of Soldiers and McCrees I see at the high plat/low diamond level, very few of them give me any actual issues.  In fact, I get fucked up by Genji far more consistently than any hitscan at any level.  I can't fucking hit him consistently with any hero, and when I do land a shot, there's a damn good chance his deflect is off CD when it happens.
I only watched it so quickly so I could get it over with... With each episode I thought 'maybe the writing will get better' and 'maybe he'll use the iron fist more instead of just fucking talking about it'. 
You're so very welcome.  I'm sorry if my I-don't-have-a-child thinking is simplistic. ;) I can't imagine the overwhelm.   Here's to deep breaths, coffee, and to the fact that bad times don't come to stay, they come to pass. 
Replace the water with equal parts water and coconut milk. Salt and pepper after and stir in minced cilantro. It's effin amazing! 
[not.good](https://media.giphy.com/media/3orifhNhn840GpMMPm/giphy.gif)  btw check your dang messages i asked you something
I suggest going to your reunion. Reconnect with those friends you lost contact with. Relax and have fun.  Don't compare your life to what you see on Facebook. For a lot of people, the only things that make it onto Facebook are the good parts of their lives...you're seeing their "edited to look always happy" versions.  The worst that can really happen is it ends up being a waste of time.
My phone has a bad habit of unlocking in my pocket. I have to go through and see where it's done this so I can delete the comments 
Fat or furious eh
If you like the look, it's a much imitated style. Parnis is a Chinese made brand that, while nowhere near the same quality, actually offers a lot of value for the money.  [Amazon link](https://www.amazon.com/gp/aw/d/B00KJYURJG/ref=cts_wa_2_vtp?ie=UTF8&amp;pf_rd_m=ATVPDKIKX0DER&amp;pf_rd_p=2897711242&amp;pf_rd_r=0E87QNV6S6X5PV78S5G4&amp;pd_rd_wg=HBkTv&amp;pf_rd_s=mobile-detail-softlines&amp;pf_rd_t=40701&amp;pi=SL110&amp;pd_rd_i=B00KJYURJG&amp;pd_rd_w=Szi3A&amp;pf_rd_i=mobile-detail-softlines&amp;pd_rd_r=0E87QNV6S6X5PV78S5G4&amp;dpPl=1&amp;dpID=41Qfl9UkJTL)
 Cool. 
Nice straw man you got there :-)
 CYKA BLYAT, Pyotr, they are on to us!
Of course... Hold on 😊
SD Streams: [English Stream 1](http://sports-night.eu/83.html) | Ad Overlays 6 | Mobile - no  Stream goes live 5 mins before game starts. If you get black screen you need to enable flash click i in address bar.   
As of right now, she intends to run again. Considering the lack of viable Democrat candidates, she just might. Now that they've spent a decade intent on anointing her, they have nobody else.
The 'buy nothing' Facebook groups in your local area are amazing. You gift whatever you want if you want and can also receive what others are gifting as well as ask if you need something. You then coordinate to pick up the item off someone's porch. 
I live near Cleveland. A few years ago they were blowing up the old innerbelt bridge, a big 6-8 lane bridge into downtown. My husband and I woke up early and trespassed way too close to the demo site (along with a dozen or so other people who found their way through a fence on a hillside). We were still probably a mile away, but way closer than any official watch sites. I saw the dynamite flash in a line and then the most intense, bone-rattling explosion, and a bunch of "holy fuck"s by all the people around us. It was awesome to see/hear but there was a definite moment of wondering if we were all going to die.
16CFE
I don't mean covering it. I mean enveloping it in rainbows. Just as the sign.
Bayleys fiance looks like a little Roman Reigns. 
The difference is that most companies don't have an adoring fanbase.
Not like Orpik didn't deserve a beating, just not like that. Orpik just got under thortons skin by refusing to fight and laying out bruin players.   Neal on the other hand should have been beaten to a pulp for that cheap shot on Marchand...fucking slimmy nasty hit
Rainbow's agreement was one band of color from red to pink. They are expanding outside of this agreement.
Does Ash do that in one of the Evil Dead movies?
It's the very essence of madness to not be soothing.
Oh i didnt even think about alexstrasza..... Uhhhhhhhh I hope that deck's bad against aggro
Saw this guy standing under the big ass Amaco sign on Skinker...
I prefer not to waste the protein. :P
Any mouse is a gaming mouse. "Gaming" mice just  offer 9,000+ DPI which you'd never actually use.
Which is why I'm saying it should be investigated. If I had to sit through 8 years of "Birth Certificates", "fema deathcamps", and a few seasons of Bengahazi then there's enough there to investigate Trump.
It really is[...](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=GRWbIoIR04c)
Definitely look into powerline adapters.  I have [these](https://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B00Y3QPG1A/ref=oh_aui_search_detailpage?ie=UTF8&amp;psc=1) and I can't recommend them enough.
blue jay lodge in mal pais?
At long last, Oiler and Leaf fans can finally stop ~~hearing everyone's butt jokes~~ being on the butt-end of everyone's jokes  WHO'S LAUGHING NOW LEAGUE!!  I KNOW I WILL BE, HAPPILY AT PLAYOFF START!! *knock wood*  edit: Why do I have a cup beside me.
I think you got it backwards. Shouldn't this say FYD does more sales in a day than BDDMV does in a month?
Especially when they feel the need to put down the women outside of their "praise."
Thank you this helped I'm not 100% sure which one I'm  but going to pick the one I would possibly enjoy doing.
You say you're looking for unicorns, i have a few im willing to part with if you'd like we can make a deal, add me if interested.
Why not just be a fake veggie like that woman I used to work with, you know the one.  Prawn mayo is OK. Sardines are OK. Tuna is OK.  I don't get it! Its still meat! You're still eating meat!
Agree that if they spent days on pressors it sounds like more than a med error problem. 
why?
It's like Princess Peach. :3
No, you're making zero sense.
But pedes only have legs.
It is our responsibility to protect the jewel of r/bluecorner
Seriously? You are arguing against straw men. Nobody in Romania would freak out if the US would reduce its military spending to more reasonable levels. Commitment to the alliance is one thing, spending is another. Your allies want to know they can count on the US, they don't care whether you spend 800 billion or 500 billion on your military.  It's your own damn Government that wants to increase military spending and it does it for its own benefit.   &gt; They start running tabloids new reports about power vacuums and go into a panic clamouring for the bomb because the US decided 20 carriers was enough ,maby we dont need 22 of those bad boys.  Just no.
I've never even done a single SBC and I totally agree with you. Every year that goes by FUT becomes more and more disgusting, not to mention it is now *the* "competitive" mode - which is a joke in itself.  There are other modes of FIFA to enjoy though, if you are not only in it for the tinkering of FUT. Even last year, the actual competitive mode was in H2H, and was even really well balanced, so anyone could be competitive out the box, play the same team as everyone else out the box.... Now, we have what you are talking about.  It's a shame really.  And while all of this is going on we have all the poor gameplay changes they have made, making the game incredibly boring and less competitive in essence....  As far as I'm concerned, all these things combined plus more not mentioned, make this the worst FIFA year I can remember. Which is my personal opinion of course.
When you start off fighting the devil and then out of bloody nowhere somehow end up morphing into a weird, deranged lunatic. All by yourself. And there's literally nobody to blame for it but yourself.  \#JustAltRightThings
love your wholesome optimism :)
Oh damn, I never considered that. Your argument has convinced me otherwise.
Well they at least want a guy who can act like he knows what he's doing. That's not too much to ask for.
Data.
How about this idea? A woman is on a date with her boyfriend, when suddenly, BOOF, he's a werewolf! (Literally, an anthropomorphic wolf wearing tatters of his human clothes) Suddenly, he's sheepishly apologizing to her while she pours on about "MY CUTE WIDDLE BOYFRIEND IS A DOGGO" , but they calm down and continue their date regardless much to the dismay of the other diners in the restaurant Tl;Dr, A nerdy werewolf and his date eat at restaurant, he transforms in the midst of dinner, he apologizes for his torn clothes and such while she adores her "DOGGO" and despite this problem, they continue their date. 
I am a full stack dev. But this merely means I can DO all 3 but won't tell you anything about my level at any of it. To be fair - anyone that learns back-end eventually HAS TO learn how to more or less manage within Linux and you have to display results to the user somehow meaning you end up learning HTML/CSS. Meaning you can do all 3.   If anything however, most full-stack programmers have their own specializations and preferences. I personally like back-end the most and detest front-end. Meaning that while technically I can make a working website on a remote server from scratch it won't beat a product made by a dedicated group of programmers. It might be fine as long as the logic of it is involved but it will likely have gaping holes in user interface and will not be maintained nearly as well as a professional dealing with dev ops/server administration could (for instance - I can't set up a fully working email server. Sending them is one thing but RECEIVING is a very complex task that escapes my grasp so I have to use existing solutions as I can't yet properly set up my own that would work well).
Went to sephora today, and I made a horrible mistake of trying out both the ceramidin liquid and cream on my hand! My hand was so plump and brightened and soft and I regret it because now I have to add both on my list to buy 😍😭  Can someone talk me out of those 2 products?? Anyone?? 
I know you're kidding but I'll try to deliver haha!
Glenway TRU is identical
I am loving those strains. May we discuss tolerance?
Actually, your best bet for under $50 is the GBS-8200 or GBS-8220.  You'll have to get a VGA to SCART pin adapter, but it will work.
He's a man of the people
I don't know why I diddn't think of this,I may do this till I swap my good top onto my brg.
what about the girl?
I'm sorry your friends are dicks. The article raises some issues about inequality and opportunity that are worth discussing but the problem is way more complex than "Pence BAD". 
April Fools? Hopefully....
Whoa, Black Betty &gt;Hammbulance
I feel like this, and your previous comment, is really important and it has been totally ignored. People started discussing consonant sounds (!!!!) instead. It is really unnerving.   Thank you for bringing this to my attention. 
Lmao, accepting everyone? Such a hoard clan. Get gud and make a clan that has standards, ffs even that one clan that saturn made had reqs. So stop being shit and do something.
Wildlands? Origin
I subbed anyway, but this is the most active
Dota 2 player here. Who is this guy?
It's a classic a timeless battle
I liked the idea of graveyard creature devotion.  A sacrificial type of devotion.
Again, not doing that. I explicitly claimed I'm not doing that from step 1.
ah thanks for looking out. I wasn't online and someone just offered to buy em anyways! 
it was a joke. reference to the song off radical suicide 
I started reading it many years ago (around 900ish?) and I just stopped when I felt like the humor became overly forced, and I wasn't a fan of the massive amount of virtue signalling and a ton of the writing. Feel free to enjoy it, that's just my two cents.
Yeah...."special"......(fucking yuck)
You seem fun loving and approachable.  
He looks embarrassed 
Royal crown set or Dieci set for a heat? Or both for two heats
[simpsons did it](https://frinkiac.com/img/S03E11/908132.jpg)
Ibaka putting in work
Join myself and whoever else is doing this! http://i.imgur.com/cX5sVDZ.png
How awesome of you to do this.  I guess I need to adjust my skins....didn't really think about doing this but it looks cools so I guess I'll be cutting out my wallpaper now!  Have an upvote on me!
Donating blood. I lived in Europe in the 80's and apparently there was a lot of mad cow running around back then, so on the off chance that I have latent mad cow sitting in my veins, I can't donate. Banned for life.
I'm a bot, *bleep*, *bloop*. Someone has linked to this thread from another place on reddit:  - [/r/awakened] [Willa Wonka Was Beat Up by Budda, heard it here first. Be Good!](https://np.reddit.com/r/awakened/comments/62p7o8/willa_wonka_was_beat_up_by_budda_heard_it_here/)  [](#footer)*^(If you follow any of the above links, please respect the rules of reddit and don't vote in the other threads.) ^\([Info](/r/TotesMessenger) ^/ ^[Contact](/message/compose?to=/r/TotesMessenger))*  [](#bot)
Ok, so just to double check, with your interpretation you can get to wizard 14/other full caster 6 and have a 9th level slot, and have up to 9th level spells that are always prepared as per arcana cleric 17 feature, but you still cannot cast them?
Has Jokic been a bit more hesitant shooting it from the elbow recently?
They did the right thing. Go out on top. Then, you can always come back to put other people over in a non-wrestling capacity because your image as a top guy was never tarnished because you never had a descent. 
So, am I understanding your sentiment correctly in assuming that an answer to OP's post along the following lines would not be unacceptable?  "It'd show me they're not very funny at all, period!"
left /r/diepio?
I deleted their app when they disabled the comments for controversial topics. Pussies.
Maricon (short for Maria Concepcion)
Spray paint your prescriptions 
With a.. compass??
* (x2.0) Alejandro Valverde * (x1.8) Sergio Henao * (x1.6) Alberto Contador  * (x1.4) Rigoberto Uran * (x1.2) Romain Bardet * (x1.0) Simon Špilak * (x1.0) Ion Izagirre * (x1.0) Diego Ulissi
Just make sure they're about me.
Sexy salad
2 of the 5 drivers you compared him to are in the top 5 greatest drivers of all time, and all of them have had championship caliber teams since day 1. Comparing the start of their careers with Larson's is stupid, considering how mediocre Ganassi's equipment was for his first couple seasons.
hi... could you add me please? username csminions@gmail.com
State backlash on black Panthers may have had something to do with them starting fires and then killing first responders. They were a swell racist group that I'm sure would have led with the upmost decency and fairness to all members of their community. But let's say we did fire and replace 700,000 officers. How long before 5 did some corrupt shit. 1% would be 7000 corrupt officers with 10s of thousands of corrupt incidents. Could you imagine the shit storm on reddit. It takes a cold hearted person to not want better from police. It takes naivete to think that any replacements will do better. And it takes either an idiot or complete denial of histories lessons to believe a vigilante system will lead to anything except disaster.
Mattis rocks
they are leaving Shumpert, doubling Kyrie and LeBron
Can we get a redo? I think we are all behind the spirit of the post.
I'm only one episode in and I can tell you if you didn't like seasons 8, 9 and 10 you won't like this one
Its not just a matter of 'gullible' there is sort of the phenomenon of mob mentality or 'group-think' going on here too.
I usually don't stir it and the concentrates don't really appeal to me. Asthma doesn't get along with that. 
Man, what do you expect to get as an answer? nobody can guarantee you a crystal drops, so...!  Now, if I were you, I would dive in for two more times, worst can happen is I dont get it, but at least I will know.But if I dont do it, I will wonder for a looooong time!
Fuck the op. What kind of loser just randomly posts a photo with a totally incorrect tag line. Ugh. Just stop. 
Damn.... That's a horrifying site. I'm so sorry. Did you lose any pieces in the crash?
A snongle, if you will.
BUYING: weekend 1 ga! Please and thank you 🙏
To be fair, in the last administration all they had to agree to do was just stop Obama and the dems from doing anything.  They have to iron out actual details now and try to make compromising legislative choices within their own party for the first time in 8 years.  They all run and get elected on the idea that they are unmovable idealistically; so now they can't compromise for fear of losing their seat.  Short of a miracle happening, the GOP has a full year to figure out how to work with itself before suffering massive losses in 2018.  A party built (in recent times) on being difficult to work with has to learn to work with itself.  Poetic at best.  At worst it's a fucking shit show that ruins our country for somewhere from 20 years to forever...
YOU CAN'T ESCAPE THE DARKNESS BARRY ! YOU CAN'T ESCAPE THE DARKNEEEEESSSSS !
It annoys me that he's .5 EWA away from the big 300
I assume he hates your gut? It's a known rounding issue. If monthly increase is below 1, it'll become 0, effectively killing your chance for improve relation. Wait a bit so he doesn't hate you as much. Also stack improve relation modifiers with max prestige, Diplomatic ideas, and a Diplomat and you should see actual increases.
That's because the book didn't tell you how much time has passed, so it feels that way. But I thought it was very clevah!
[Relevant](https://m.popkey.co/96bde6/WkMVq.gif)
/r/mylittleonions [](/lunawait)
I'm pretty sure most exchanges will do it automatically. Otherwise you'll probably have to send it to a Storj counterparty address with your Ethereum address in the message.   The Storj migration chat would be the best place to ask for more accurate info.
tell her what you are thinking.
This is the highest rated game on steam.  It is not "lesser known".
Lmao you people are fucking pathetic.
cheeks aren't fat.   they're perfect 
The Midwest Access Coalition helps pay for travel to Illinois, which is a blue island in a sea of red. http://midwestaccesscoalition.org/
Get back to the past, Jack!
Realmente, o Cabral é citado como o líder de uma organização. Mas o caso do Cunha não deixa de amedrontar o Cabral. 
Your body does actually need some fat AND protein.
Hahahahahjahajajajahahhahajahahhahahahahahahahhahahahahahahahahahahahahhahahahahahjahahahahahahahahahjahahajajajajajahahhahahahahajajajjajaahhhaha
The second guy had a good point though. He lost me after the "Just saying... interesting pattern" part, but it was a good point up till then.   Of course, the first guy is far too self-unaware to get the message.
full unicorn set, saffron spiralis, forest green cert troikas, crimson and saffron alchemists, proton, victor polygonal and a zsr ?  possibly sub in septem for something
All in listening and hoping you're clear. You can get into and off somebody in a fender car if you aren't clear when you come up, but you have to be smarter than that in a sprint car
Amethyst would be purple drank.
"Kernel and browser update" = slow news day.
Pale skin means you aren't outdoors all day working and big eyes are associated with youth. Some do get it to look like whites, but in reality the standards were set even before European contact. Even in black America, light skin black girls "yellows" are sought after.
feat. Travis Scott
I don't think he was ever voiced by a woman. 
jesus.. he has only been there for 2 months.  although it seems longer.  The prior guy was telling republicans to get in the back of the bus at this point
Yo bud, you posted this 2 more times, heads up, i'll assume it was an accident but I think you should get rid of the other 2 posts!
When the other party is acting in good faith and wants to compromise, sure. The GOP just lurches further and further right and demands we move to the new center. You mean well but you're preaching appeasement. We've tried that for 25 years now and it's what got us where we are. 
&gt;I seriously feel like the voting base of the GOP doesn't realize they are part of the working/consumer class.  The ones I know personally don't. I'm sure there's other factors at play but the ones I know live in very poor towns but they make decent money for the areas they live. Probably 40-45k per year. Because they make a lot for the where live it's as if they can't see that they are still poor. They think the GOP policies are geared towards people like them. They couldn't wrap their head around the fact that the money they make isn't a lot. 
APEX
APEX
Seems more geographical than anything. No one says that shit outside of the US unironically. 
Sadly a twitter poll is more secure than a USL one
Oh yeah, now I remember. You get impeached based on a roulette spinned every time you get accused of something. I guess that makes sense, otherwise, why would you call it odds if it was anything other than chance.
Bible also says grow a beard.  Bible also says don't eat shrimp.  The fuck is wrong with these people.
Ereck Fucking Flowers
It's way more cost-effective to provide services and utilities to dense areas than your single-family sprawl that you like so much. The buildings don't even have to be that tall to build densely: Paris has a height limit of only 121 feet.
My brain does a special sort of freak out twitch thing when kids other then my own are over and start eyeballing our lego city. I have portable Lego tables and lunchbox building pads  with a bunch of freebuild Lego blocks and a few small creator type sets I move out and the city goes "off limits".  
Dankeschön! That is awesome hearing the song broken down like that. I loved hearing Till's backing vocals at the end. 
Being suicidal and violent lyrics can't go hand in hand? What type of logic is that? And that's a really strong argument as to why they aren't self aware, if you don't think it is so then clearly it isn't.
I've always been curious, what's 2 hoses like?
Now would be a good time to update wishlists. *hint hint*    After the mess that was today and I feel less like my head is still swimming, I'm going to randomly start emailing. I need a happy, and doing the happy mail thing works for me. 
YESSS
There is plenty of testimony online and in print from pilots confirming this turn was near impossible even for an experienced pilot.   Hani Hanjour made a 270 degree diving corkscrew turn to strike the side of the building opposite from his angle of approach.   The Pentagon had been under renovation since 1998, rotating around the structure upgrading one wing at a time. The wing struck on 9/11 happened to be the wing being renovated at the time which is why the casualties are so low.  Asking people online to prove things before attempting to do your own research is pathetic, and is the main reason the official narrative is blindly accepted. If you aren't curious about the events of 9/11 then don't ask me to send you info. If you are, then start to search for yourself and form opinions that way.
Even if you don't hold it, it should be possible to tell that it's fake from the appearance of the display or the proportions of the bezel and sensor/front camera location. Most of the time, screens on knockoffs are not laminated, so their grayish appearance when off is a dead giveaway if the real deal has a laminated screen. High-end Samsungs also have Super AMOLED displays, which have a dark bluish tint to them (as opposed to the black of laminated LCD panels), and under the light you can see the PenTile subpixel arrangement.
They're her new "mommy makeover" boobs. New implants have to settle over time but also Amber's been shoving them in everyone's face like a Walmart greeter and those smiley face stickers.
Compression socks definitely go under.
no he looks better with the beard 
Yeah it's a ghost town
I've been super behind on skill inheritance and have just been haphazardly popping on various skills and probably wasting my precious SP. I'm pretty happy with my Hector and Takumi, but can anyone recommend builds for Tiki (Y) and Nowi? I threw Vantage 1/2 on them just because it seems universally useful, but not sure where to go from here. I gave Tiki (Y) Nowi's weapon through inheritance, but still a couple hundred points away and not even sure if it's the best route anyway.  Would also appreciate input on Linde and Azura, but if that's too much for one post I'm happy to focus on the dragons for now.
and then cayde "YA RIGHT... THATS WHAT I THOUGHT...." notice the sarcasm...? anybody?
Thanks! for your reply. It doesn't matter, as long as it sounds close enough. The other guy suggested "Усраться" I think this one makes sense! But I will keep your suggestion in mind too :) Thanks again!
Hmm, you may have wanted to close that computer and move that package. 😬
Why am I not seeing any comments?  E: Now I see only half of them, any ideas?
Hey, its the dude from DNews!
We are leaving really early Thursday morning, might be able to squeeze you in
Yep, I made a shitpost about it [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/FlashTV/comments/5q0oom/theory_snurtle_the_turtle_is_savitar_confirmed/). I guess your one isn't too bad though.
Looks like a silver carp.  They were introduced to the USA to eat unwanted algae in fish farms, but they escaped into the waterways. They outcompete native species and are a huge pest, plus they like to jump out of the water when spooked as a defence mechanism. This poses a serious hazard (think 40 pound fish is flying at your head).
Looks old, but not necessarily bad. '96+ ZJs had that ball swivel on the top of their sway links, unlike the solid links in the early years.
The A, B, and C team thing was more a comment about priority, though i can see where you can get the quality angle from it. Still, its not great to know that there are 2 whole games ahead of the next historical TW.   As for the disappointing part...I honestly didn't even know there was supposed to be an announcement. I was browsing my frontpage today when i saw this post fairly high on it. Since TW:W dropped i haven't checked the community very often, if at all. The last TW news i recall was that there was a new historical TW in the works and it would be in an era we haven't been too yet. That was maybe 6 months ago? So yeah, i pop on today and see that the next TW game is TW:W 2 and that the historical TW isn't coming out anytime soon. So yeah, I'm actually kinda disappointed.   Was i misinformed? Yeah probably. I made assumptions. But I'm not exactly going to take part in a community thats currently pushing a game I have no interest in on the off chance I get news of a game I am interested in. I can't imagine I'm the only one. 
D:}
It was a very recent purchase and had a valid temporary license for Louisiana, just not Alabama.  Dumb not to check and verify, but is truly more on the ignorance side than deceitful side.  In some states you don't need the permit. Marijuana has to be the biggest flag.  He might be passing tests now, but given the incident with the gun and small amount of weed, not sure you can be confident that he gives you much playing time in the NFL like Gordon and Gregory.  I would imagine that drops him more than anything right there. 
Anythings a dildo if you're brave enough.
Elemental Shaman will replace Dragon Priest as the king of Curvestone. 
I've spent a few summers depressed.  It's extra depressing when you live in the north.
Yes. It does. I can confirm.
I like the thought of the name going to an aggressive terrain coaster which thrashes you through the forest and doesn't let up.
Yea, the game itself was OK but I had way more fun with it as a point of interest when I went to a new area. Hands down coolest mini-game. We'll see how fun a standalone is though. 
I have a size 9 for sale. PM if interested. 
Idk, im more preferential to "honey" cause of how nice and sweet they are
you are so so sexy.
I really they have space Nazi zombies where I get to kill Hitler with a ray gun 
**HAVE**  1 Mewtwo EX (Promo XY 183)    1 Landorus EX RA (Boundaries Crossed)   1 Moltres EX RA (Legendary Battle Deck)   1 M Rayquaza EX RA (Colorless) 1 Latios EX RA (Roaring Skies) 1 M Latios EX FA (Roaring Skies) 1 Entei (Promo HGSS 20)  1 Torchic, Treeco, Mudkip (Promo XY 36-38)  1 Darkrai EX RA (BREAKpoint)    1 Hoopa EX Promo (Confined, Promo XY 85) 1 Arceus, Latios, Reshiram, White Kyurem, Dialga (Full art promos 74, 77, 79, 81, 83) 1 Giratina Promo (Devour Light, Promo XY 184) 1 FA Mega Gardevoir EX (Steam Siege)   1 FA Steelix EX (Steam Siege)   2 Tauros GX RA 1 Lunala GX RA 1 Solgaleo GX RA 1 Umbreon GX RA 1 Primarina GX RA 1 Lurantis GX Rainbow Rare  *In-Game Packs*  Quantity|Set|Price US$ ---|---|--- 0  |BW Base set  |0.8 0  |Boundaries Crossed |0.65 0  |Dark Explorers |0.75 0  |Dragons Exalted |0.65 2  |Emerging Powers |0.3 0  |Legendary Treasures |0.4 0  |Next Destinies |0.75 0  |Noble Victories |0.80 0  |Plasma Blast |0.65 0  |Plasma Freeze |1.50 0  |Plasma Storm |0.65 0  |Call of Legends |1.0 0  |Double Crisis |1.0 0  |Dragon Vault |1.0 0  |Generations  |0.6 0  |HGSS Base set |1.5 0  |Triumphant  |1.5 0  |Undaunted  |1.5 0  |Unleashed  |1.0 2  |XY Base set  |0.3 8  |Ancient Origins |0.3 13 |BREAKpoint |0.3 15 |BREAKthrough |0.3 7  |Evolutions  |0.3 10 |Fates Collide   |0.3 3  |FlashFire  |0.3 4  |Furious Fists |0.3 3  |Phantom Forces |0.3 7  |Primal Clash |0.3 0  |Roaring Skies |0.5 9  |Steam Siege |0.3 ---  Theme Decks:  1 Bolt Twister (Phantom Forces)    1 Mewtwo Mayhem (Evolutions)  Tins:  3 Heart's Shield (Magearna EX)  1 Mountain's Fury (Volcanion EX)  1 Psychic Staredown (Mewtwo EX)   1 Thunder's Crash (Pikachu EX)  1 Magikarp's Revenge (Gyarados EX)  1 Great Wave (Kyogre EX) 1 Swift Current (Pikachu Libre x Suicune Trainer's Kit)    ---  **WANT**  Codes:  Rayquaza &amp; Keldeo Battle Arena code Zapdos box Legendary Battle Deck code  Theme Decks:  Dragonsnarl Ice shock   Psy crusher Frost ray Mind wipe Solar strike  Cards:  1 Celebi Prime (Triumphant)   1 Druddigon (Dragon Vault Galaxy foil)   ---  Accepting offers for the cards/decks. I'd rather trade for the ones I want, but can also do Paypal (goods and services)
&gt; More than "what most are told" sounds like doctors are withholding information, when in fact they are usually (probably not always, but usually) presenting the patient with the best method to treat their HIV.   Exactly. And sure, there are technically "many more" options if you include outdated drugs with horrendous side effect profiles (some of them *do* still work today, after all), but most people aren't going to jump at the "this one gives you projectile diarrhea" option when presented with a choice. 
Hahahaha. Killin' it with the dubois reference. My people!!!
Please link me the outoftheloop equivalent here. Please! X
Is everyone in Montreal for the Jays game or something?
Yikes. Can't watch Bourne movies either. 
&gt; I'm looking at you, WHM with an i80 ARR Relic staff in The Antitower.  Ugh I have run into a WHM in there using it as well.
PM'd 
Ride a lot.  I lost that feeling many, many years ago after just riding a lot.  I'm jealous of people that still get feeling.  
Sooooo jealous. My supertarget only has like 5 iPod mydevices rn. I'm not even exaggerating. We're sending more out than we are getting back in. 
looks like i'm not getting high tonight!
*Things I want for Christmas.*
  Username | Join date | Link karma | Comment karma :- | :-: | -: | -: xKONIGSTIGERx | 18 January 2016 / 1 year  | 30 | 10  ^^This ^^information ^^does ^^not ^^guarantee ^^a ^^successful ^^swap. ^^Creator ^^- ^^lambawamba
Jesus Christ, wtf is that thing…
High wall, password: luna
